



*GIIIIIII-*



With such hard sound resounding the bullets were halted before the eyes of Ehitorujue. The positions of the stopped bullets were before his head, heart, and his four limbs. While those shots were a sniping that was like threading through the eye of a needle, but not even a single shot shifted for even a millimeter from their target. It was a special move that fired bullets through a space overflowing to the brim with shockwave and barrage without any deviation at all.



The first bullets emitted shockwaves consecutively within an instant to a pinpoint spot. They were burst bullet. The shockwaves that were directed to a pinpoint spot made a fatal crack on Ehitorujue's barrier just with one shot. And then, the second burst bullets right behind those first bullets that were fired with the same trajectory pushed in as though pile-driving the first shots and pulverized the barrier right away.



*PAAAAAAN* Faster than the resounding sound of pulverization, the magic bullets of simultaneous attacks on six vital spots approached to pierce Ehitorujue.



Ehitorujue quietly lifted his hand toward that. Even if he did something like that, the electromagnetically accelerated bullets should be unstoppable. It was obvious that a bullet would easily bite a hole into that palm and bore into the heart behind it, was how it seemed to be but…



"So you broke my barrier. Furthermore your personality that unhesitatingly aimed at your lover's heart even though she possesses automatic regeneration…you are making me enjoying this, irregular."



The palm and chest of Ehitorujue who was saying such thing with the corner of his lips raised didn't seem to receive any kind of damage.



The cause of that was surely the small whirling black sphere generated ahead of that palm. Most likely it was gravity magic 'Severance Catastrophe'. It swallowed the bullet and then crushed it with its super gravity.



His delicate control that could do such thing, also his reaction speed that could sense electromagnetically accelerated bullet and stopped it, were absurd as expected. It was unclear whether it was because he planned to play around or perhaps because of his dignity as a god that considered being touched was a disrespect to him that he didn't rely on the automatic regeneration.



Even during this few moment of offense and defense, there was a meteor shower that slipped through the barrage of Cross Velt and reached Hajime. The light stars the size of a fist rushed at Hajime.



Hajime was in front of the swarm of lights that completely filled his field of vision, however, his expression showed no unease at all.



"――fuu"



He shortly breathed out.



At the next moment, the swarm of light bullets passed through Hajime's body. While small strange sounds of *jijiji-* were resounding, the bullets of certain death meaninglessly passed through Hajime as though they were attacking an illusion of him.



"Hou, that's splendid."



Ehitorujue spontaneously leaked out words of praise.



What was the cause that made the light stars slipped through which made the enemy spontaneously praised in admiration? The cause was nothing special. Hajime was merely evading the lights in high speed with the necessary minimum movement. That was all. The sounds of *jijiji-* were the sound of the light bullets grazing Hajime's clothing. That was just how barely he was evading the lights, by seeing the attacks through until the millimeter degree.



For ordinary person, Hajime looked like he was not moving, but with Ehitorujue's perception, the reflected spectacle was as though Hajime's body was making many layers of shadow clones blurring in the same spot to return to their original position.



"Well then, how about this?"



Ehitorujue waved his hand relaxedly.



Immediately several stretching lights that were moving with an irregular motion like twisting snake were fired from the halos. It didn't stop there, huge light bullets with diameter around two meters were spewed out in large amount like soap bubbles toward Hajime.



"Chih"



Hajime clicked his tongue.



Hajime used 'Ground Shrinker' and 'Air Force' tp leap away from his spot. The light whips powerfully struck the place where Hajime was standing just an instant before while the light bubbles were flying off all over the place leaving not a single gap in space.



Cross Velts were flying in all directions and the Grim Reapers were commanded to aim at Ehitorujue from all angles. However, just by a single wave of a hand, Ehitorujue pulverized every machine that got close to him.



"…"



Hajime's eyes were narrowing from seeing that scene while he made his 'Treasure Warehouse II' shined.



Right after that, a huge weapon was gripped in his hand. From a glance, it was the gatling railgun 'Metsurai' with six rotating barrels. However, its size was completely different. It was enlarged by two sizes bigger. Furthermore, looking closer all the six barrels, each of them consisted of also six barrels.



――Super large electromagnetic acceleration gatling cannon Metsurai Disaster



It was a gatling cannon with 6×6 rotating barrels where each barrel had the same size with the barrel of the original Metsurai. It fired off seventy-two thousand round per minute, this weapon went even beyond being evaluated as a monster, an outrageous weapon where the idea of creating it could even be called as stupid.



Hajime pulled the trigger of such outrageous weapon.



*VOO–!!*



Such strange sound like the air itself was rupturing was resounding. Metsurai Disaster that instantly generated a squall of cartridges, pulverized everything in its line of fire――the meteor shower, the light bubbles, and even the light apostles just like scrap papers before approaching Ehitorujue.



The approaching attack was already like a muddy stream of crimson light, a storm of destruction in the same meaning of natural disaster that swallowed everything in its path.



"That's something dreadful. But, what meaning it has if it doesn't hit? ――'Great Vortex of White End'."



Ahead of Ehitorujue's two hands that he stretched forward, there was platinum light whirling. That sparkling vortex looked just like a silver river.



Right after that, the crimson muddy stream of magic bullets that broke through the likes of common obstacle like they were nothing, was split into two in front of Ehitorujue as though a single stroke had bisected it, and then the attack was swallowed by two silver rivers at two sides. Naturally not even a single magic bullet reached Ehitorujue.



"…So even this doesn't reach. Good grief."



A meteor shower rushed from the back at Hajime who was swearing reflexively. Perhaps they were even teleported that the many light stars had circled behind Hajime without him realizing, they approached to swallow him whole.



Sometimes with a movement that didn't even leave afterimage, sometimes with a swaying motion like fluttering wind, Hajime was evading while using Donner and Metsurai Disaster, added with Cross Velts he detected the gaps of the meteor shower and fired crimson flashes toward Ehitorujue. The mechanical monsters that were unfolding a fierce battle with the light apostles were also launching an attack at Ehitorujue if they found an opening.



The platinum lights that beautifully dance boisterously in the white space and the rushing crimson lights that weaved in between displayed a view that should be called as superb which would surely steal the heart of the viewer watching from the side.



Amidst that view, without relaxing his offense and defense at all while handling Hajime's shots and the Grim Reapers' attacks, Ehitorujue was showing a composed smile and talked to Hajime.



"Come to think of it, irregular. How did you finish off Aruvheit? He too was more or less my retainer that possessed divinity. Even if it was you, I don't think that he would be killed that easily."



The revolving light stars took a great detour while aiming at Hajime from all directions, Hajime was intercepting them with his Donner spinning like a wheel while he snorted and responded at Ehitorujue.



"Hah, that snob is a god you say? Don't make me laugh. He easily died while begging for his life unsightly. Even the monster in labyrinths has more guts than something like that."



"Hou, easily you say."



Light bubbles buried the space to the brim. Hajime stored in his Metsurai Disaster and in exchange he took out 'Agni-Orkan' and launched missile swarm to the front.



Terrific thunderous roars and flame blasts rose and a hole was created on the light bubbles cage.



Hajime instantly rushed through and he aligned the aim of Agni-Orkan at Ehitorujue and pulled the triggers.



But, at that moment Ehitorujue snapped his finger. At the same time suddenly thunders rained down from empty space. Those thunders that were focused and compressed to the limit already became spears made from lightning. If it had to be named, then it would be the lightning spear fired from god――the 'Lightning Divine Spear'.



"tsk"



Without even any time to react using his perception skill, the sparking platinum spears that flew in lightning speed from Hajime's blind spot within a few meter easily pierced Agni-Orkan. Just with that, the frame of the artifacts warped, in addition, the combustion powder packed inside the missiles caught fire which caused a great explosion.



Although Hajime had immediately thrown away Agni-Orkan and withdrew from that spot, the missiles that boasted tremendous might even by their lonesome were exploding all at once from really close range, in addition the lightning divine spears were also rupturing which scattered its compressed lightning to all direction, Hajime was unable to avoid getting damage. The blasts and thunders penetrated through his 'Vajra' and his clothing which was tougher than it looked because it was made from tough metal and monster hide, which clearly told just how terrible the radiated force was.



"Guu…(lightning speed attack from random coordinate that is instantly invoked…as expected, this guy is still holding many hands yet)"



Hajime was whispering in his heart while groaning unintentionally, Ehitorujue who glanced at such Hajime continued his talk as though nothing had happened.



"Nothing you could hide from me. I know already. You invoked a concept magic right? The situation at that time could be said as extreme for you. Although not even in my dream I could imagine you would produce a concept so powerful that could even possibly defeat Aruvheit, that was unexpected even for me…"



"…"



Hajime who lost Agni-Orkan displayed a look that pondered something for an instant, then he scattered explosion hand grenade at the surrounding which blown away the light bubbles while he took out Metsurai Disaster once more. Like that he held back Ehitorujue while he controlled Cross Velts and placed one of them above Ehitorujue's head.



"Perhaps, you have even created a concept of 'godslaying'? And then, you was hiding that trump card close to your chest, and holding the hope that you can do something with that you came until this far. Fufufu, how cute."



Ehitorujue didn't even glance at the Cross Velt above him, far from that he didn't even close his mouth while swiping his hand overhead.



Just with that the Cross Velt that was going to shoot was cut with an invisible blade and exploded. The loaded bullets scattered around lethally like a frag grenade, but even those were repelled at the space before Ehitorujue and didn't reach him.



Hajime saw that happened, but he didn't even click his tongue, he closely observed the state of Ehitorujue who was talking while basking in joy and he quietly narrowed his eyes. Ehito who didn't even pay any attention to such Hajime then licked his lips smoothly.



"By using that, it's possible to separate the soul of me and the vampire princess, and kill only me, that's what you are thinking correct?"



"…So you find out. Well, I also don't have any mood to lie. My trump card is powerful you know? That calm expression of yours is going to warp into terror and regret soon."



"Fuhah, so you still believe that the soul of this woman is safe. That figure of yours howling while clinging to a nonexistent illusion, is truly, comical to the extreme."



Saying that, Ehito snapped his fingers once more.



Right after that, Hajime's movement came to a sudden stop with his body pitched forward.



"――"



The cause was obvious. The Metsurai Disaster that Hajime held was caught in a distorted space. That space distortion was in a square block shape that tightly pressed together. Metsurai was fixed at the center of that.



Almost at the same time, a spear of thunder came flying once more from an empty space without any advance sign.



"Shit-"



While swearing abuse reflexively, Hajime tried to release Metsurai Disaster by storing it into 'Treasure Warehouse II'. However, as though that action had been foreseen, Ehitorujue whispered "――'Manifestation of Perceived Nightmare'."



Hajime's neck flew off. His four limbs were plucked off, and his heart was gouged.



"KAAAH!!"



A loud yell of fighting spirit surged.



The source of the yell was from Hajime who was thought to be dead. The scene just now was the illusion that was prepared by Ehitorujue. The illusion was so real that if the victim wasn't careful they might die for real just from that. Hajime exploded the magic power in his body and used the momentum to invigorate himself and blew away the illusion.



But, it didn't change that his consciousness was stolen for an instant. The compensation for that opening was his Metsurai Disaster.



The divine lightning spear stabbed. Metsurai Disaster met the same end like Agni-Orkan.



――Strong



Hajime honestly appraised his enemy.



Deployment of technique, the scale of invocation, power, every single aspect was easily surpassing Yue of before. There was also no sign of his magic power running out. The great number of meteor shower fired from his halos might be moving almost automatically, there was no sign at all that Ehito was having trouble in controlling them, the light apostles were also created without end, and even with all that he was still rapidly invoking age of god class magic that was extremely powerful.



If it was anyone else than Hajime fighting here then they would instantly be killed inevitably.



As though to further cornering Hajime who had completely lost two of his prided artifacts, Ehitorujue opened his mouth exultantly.



"It echoed quiet lusciously."



"Aa?"



"The vampire princess――Yue is it? The scream of your woman, it was really meltingly sweet."



"…"



Hajime's expression fell out.



"With the ownership of her body stolen, she who had become only a soul resisted admirably. But, the more she resisted the more intense the pain running through her. …Ku-ku-ku-, it was visible for me, the figure of the vampire princess enduring desperately with clenched teeth inside this body. But even that didn't continue forever, she couldn't endure and screamed. And then, she felt terror feeling her soul vanishing from the edge, while trembling…her last words were, […Hajime, I'm sorry]. Fufufu."



"…"



"After that she disappeared. Everything happened while she was tasting terror and despair. Do you understand, irregular? The hope that you came chasing doesn't exist right from the beginning-! Fuhah, fuhahahahaha-"



Ehitorujue raised a loud laughter. Indeed, Hajime's magic eye couldn't see Yue's soul, he could only perceive a silver soul taking root inside melding everywhere. It was as though that view was displaying the truth of Ehitorujue's words…



Hajime wordlessly threw several hand grenades to the air. He shot them all using Donner. At that moment, the light stars around the hand grenades dropped on the ground altogether.



What Hajime used was gravity grenade――it had a special effect that created super gravitational area when it was activated. With that effect, the surrounding light bullets were felled.



Hajime's hand was holding Schlagen AA. It completed its charging in a moment and the eighty-eight millimeter sniping cannon(Acht Acht) specialized in penetration roared.



The fired crimson flash charged straight through the barrage zone that was thinned by the gravity grenades just like going through a no man's land.



Ehitorujue lifted his hand. Barriers were visibly layered by two, three layers before him.



The fang of Schlagen AA blasted the first layer of barrier, bit a hole in the second barrier after a moment of opposition, and smashed even the third layer of the barrier and assaulted Ehitorujue. But, the three layers divine barrier had obviously decreased the strength of the shot, in that state naturally it was unable to ignore the effect of the two white vortexes staying at both sides of Ehito. The eighty-eight millimeter shell had its trajectory vainly twisted and got swallowed into the vortex of compression.



"I am a god. As long as I have automatic regeneration than you attack won't even make me feel itchy but…know that even touching me is an insolence."



And then, even while saying such thing Ehito waved his hand in a complicated gesture with a wide grin as though saying that this was payback.



"――"



Right after that, the space all around Hajime including above and below burst open. What was produced from that was a tremendous impact. It was a space rupture that was even more detailed and powerful than the 'Quaking Sky of Four Directions' casted in the devil king castle. Furthermore, from behind Hajime, perhaps even using teleportation, a lot of light stars were already there unnoticed moving toward Hajime.



This too was also an overwhelming attack where there was no time to react and no place to escape. Hajime took out his variable great shield 'Aidion' to face this. The spherical shield instantly operated its gimmick and deployed to cover Hajime.



Thunderous roar.



The impact of space rupture from all directions blown away the first layer of 'Aidion' into pieces with one attack. The fierce impact was transmitted through 'Aidion' that caused Hajime's left hand which was supporting it below to scream.



Storm of pursuing attack came right there. Light stars in immense number attacked one after another, not giving any time for the shield to restore itself. 'Aidion' which was swallowed by the storm of light looked shining just like a star.



Even so, its hardness that didn't allow penetration should be called as an impregnable fortress.



But, even that defensive power was nothing more than an interesting side show for Ehitorujue, he suddenly lifted his hand and created a bluish white flame on his palm. And then, he blew it off gently to fly toward the shield.



The blue flame soared softly without any sound, it then impacted 'Aidion' that was still receiving concentrated fire――like that the protective wall was easily penetrated.



Right after that,



"GAAAAAAAAAA-!?"



A scream resounded.



The gimmick of 'Aidion' was released and from inside Hajime who was wrapped in flame leaped out.



Teleported meteor shower approached him in no time at all, the Grim Reapers defended Hajime as the substitute of their master which resulted in a rain of scrapped steel raining down. At the same time, Cross Velts were also called closer from the surrounding to lay out barrier, but they too were pierced by lightning divine spears by the dozens and exploded to all direction. While clenching his teeth to the sacrifices around him, Hajime broke through the encirclement and compressed his crimson magic power with an expression that warped in pain. At the next moment, he converted the compressed magic power into impact and just barely blew away the blue flame and the rushing light stars.



At the same time, 'Aidion that was left behind' had its iron wall broken and light stars rushed inside from the opening, it then received attacks from inside and outside and got pulverized into pieces.



"Haahahahahah, what happened with your big talk from before? You have turned into a really shabby appearance right now."



Ehitorujue laughed in amusement.



Ahead of his gaze, there was the figure of Hajime breathing roughly with burn injuries here and there every single part of his clothing damaged by fire. It also appeared that he had converted a considerable amount of his magic power into impact to blow away the blue flame and light stars, so his magic power had decreased considerably. 'All Element Resistance' and 'Vajra' were reduced to mere consolation as protection in front of the attacks' might, Hajime couldn't help but shudder from that.



"Haa haa, just now was…Yue's…"



"No, it was mine. It seemed the vampire princess could use it, but from the beginning this magic was something that I used. It penetrates every obstacle and destroys only its target. It's called 'Divine Flame'. How is it? It has quite a good flavor isn't it?"



"…"



Hajime didn't reply. Rather than that he was pouring his mind to convert his magic power into healing power to heal his damage even just for a little. If possible he wanted to drink healing medicine but, whether Ehitorujue would allow that or not, was unclear in the end…he couldn't show an opening after receiving a fierce attack.



If Shia and others were here, they would undoubtedly stiffen from shock seeing Hajime being cornered this overwhelmingly. In actuality, even Hajime himself couldn't help but smile bitterly inside from witnessing the true power of Ehitorujue who had completely seized Yue's body.



But, naturally Hajime didn't let that show in his expression, in exchange he struck Ehitorujue with a gaze of defiance and persistence.



"Hmm, even when I told you that your beloved woman was already gone, you still don't show any sign of breaking…"



"Obviously. Just why do I have to believe your words? If you like bullshit then just talk to yourself until you are satisfied."



Ehitorujue smiled wryly from the way Hajime talked. It was as though he was waiting for Hajime's recovery, he relaxed his attack and talked.



"Your existence is truly irregular. Because of Freed's appearance, the balance of the game was almost broken, so in order to make it more enjoyable I brought in people with power from another world yet…you become a strong person that not even my favorite could bare his fang to."



"…Why, did you do something like summoning limited at just this time?"



A war game of human versus devil. The nasty game that Ehitorujue held. His words about Freed breaking the balance made Hajime slightly scowled. It was slightly surprising that Freed's labyrinth conquering was something irregular outside of god's will.



And then, about great labyrinth's conquering, Yue's uncle Denreed also did the same thing three hundred years ago. However, from what Hajime learned from historical fact, at that time there was no record of hero summoning being performed and he also didn't hear any story about anything like that.



Why it was only at this time, such question was only something natural to be thought of by a person who got dragged into it. Though Hajime going along with Ehitorujue's story also had the purpose of merely buying time to recover.



"Different from in the past, there was no capable person in this present era that was capable of opposing Freed you see. Never I imagined that other than the vampire princess, even the dragon race is also still surviving. Both of them were hidden skillfully. …If there is no good pawn in this world then nothing could be done except by providing it from another world."



"…Another world, huh."



"Correct. Although the connection to your world is completely a coincidence. It was a result that coincides with me searching for a person with high affinity that could possibly become my vessel. Even for a god body, crossing the boundary of the world is not something easy. To say nothing of a soul without a vessel, even directly interfering with outside Holy Precincts is difficult. As the result, I somehow succeeded dragging down someone from above world but…including an irregular like you, there were also a lot of extras coming along here."



According to Ehitorujue's story, Kouki was similar with Yue, he was chosen based on his possibility to become a vessel. Most likely Ehitorujue was using a magic like the compass of guidance to search. But, Ehitorujue who had no vessel that was a flesh body could only wield his power completely within Holy Precincts, furthermore it seemed that his power was repressed in the earth because that world had superior rank so his effort didn't go well.



The result of that was the summoning of all the classmates. In other words, everyone else other than Kouki only seemed to get 'dragged in' unintentionally by god. There was no story more annoying than this.



"Although, thanks to that the best vessel that I thought had been lost three hundred years ago was discovered, that's why this could be said as a windfall. Fufu, with this I can exhibit my power in full even outside the Holy Precincts. Crossing over to another world is also easy."



Most likely even the body of an apostle was insufficient as god's body because it would lower his divinity. If that wasn't the case then he would not be this delighted from managing to obtain a vessel.



Ehitorujue opened and closed his hand basking in joy. Hajime then asked something that he had actually wondered about all this time.



"Ehitorujue…what are you?"



"What a really abstract question that is, irregular. But, no matter what is said, naturally the answer has been decided. I am the god that created and ruled over everything."



Ehitorujue introduced himself as the transcendental creator god and also the ruling god.



But, Hajime snorted to that.



"No, you or no god or anything. You didn't create this world, you are also not ruling over everything. You are not a supernatural existence that mankind imagined You are merely an existence that is possessing power mightier than mankind."



"…Hou. With what kind of basis you are saying such thing?"



Perhaps he got his interest attracted from that, Ehitorujue then asked Hajime back.



"Isn't that simple? Your perception cannot detect Yue who was at the bottom of the abyss, and also the dragon race who hid outside this continent. Your strength only reaches this continent, even then it's only at the scale that doesn't reach the abyss. Power at that level is just too tiny for the creator right?"



"Ku-ku-ku-, to call someone like me as tiny. And? If I am not a god then what am I?"



Hajime thrust his answer with an expression that vaguely looked like he was chewing a bitter bug.



"…You are a 'human of another world' the same like us."



"Hmm. Because I am not a god but I possess a mighty power, then I must be a human from outside world the same like you all…that's your reasoning."



"Not only that. In the first place it was already strange by the point of time that you know about the concept of 'outside world'. 'Because there is none in this world then search for a capable person from other world'…such idea won't come out unless you know about the existence of another world right from the start. Even in our world that is overflowing with fantasy entertainment that concept is only a wild idea. If you are an existence in the level that is able to create the world then I can accept that, but just like I said just now, you are not an all-knowing and almighty supernatural existence, based on that it's only natural to think that you know about the existence of another world by the same reason like us."



Hearing those words, Ehitorujue went "hmm" and nodded once, then he began to clap dramatically.



"Splendid, perhaps that's what I should say. Indeed I am a human from another world. Originally, I only reached the height of magic. Although, through the passing many months and years the gathered faith granted my divinity that sublimated my soul, through that there is no doubt that I am a god."



And then, he suddenly lifted his hand. Right after that, thunder boomed in empty air, blue flame exploded, strong wind stormed, the air froze, white smoke whirled.



For Hajime, those were a sight he was used to. However, the dimension of the power focused there far surpassed what he had seen in the past.



Five heavenly dragons were created. They were the magnificent incarnations of atrocious tyranny that Yue created from the fusion of gravity magic and the highest class elemental magic. Those heavenly dragons were fiercely glaring at Hajime with dark red eyeballs.



The presence of these heavenly dragons was clearly different with Yue's heavenly dragons. Hajime's magic eye detected materials other than the core of the heavenly dragon that was formed from magic. That pulsing dark red ore was clearly magic stone.



It appeared metamorphosis magic was used on the heavenly dragons which transformed them into a monster. Perhaps the material to form them was gathered by using space magic. Not only monster, there was also the presence of apostle from the dragons. Hajime was thoroughly knowledgeable of how troublesome these heavenly dragons were, now these dragons were added with the function where they could move independently separated from the caster's control to attack the prey, these caused Hajime to sweat coldly in his heart.



(I cannot overwhelm him in resource battle, now on top of that, there is also these troublesome newcomers in addition…well, I already imagined that this won't be easy. If I resolved myself, I can do this.)



Ahead of the gaze of Hajime who was talking to himself in his heart, the five heavenly dragons were coiling in the air with Ehitorujue at the center.



That figure of the adult Yue obeyed by the magnificent dragons was exactly like a goddess in a legend. No, any goddess from any mythology would surely be overshadowed in front of the current Yue who was obeyed by the heavenly dragons with halos behind her. There was no doubt that even the goddess of beauty Aphrodite would flee barefooted in front of her.



The person inside that body which made that divine beauty to be spoiled opened his mouth with a repulsive grin.



"Now then, irregular. You have recovered a little haven't you? We have to begin the game once more any time now. During that time, let's reminisce a bit about the past. You are going to struggle as long as you can right? It has been really a long time since I talk about myself. Entertain me-"



At the next moment, the five heavenly dragons simultaneously roared, violent killing intent and pressured weighed down on Hajime. At the same time, the meteor shower from the halos also resumed coming. The white space was filled to the brim with the heavenly dragons turned monster and the torrent of lights.





Chapter 175




The Specialty of Common Job



The roars of the five heavenly dragons shook the air.



The heavenly dragons that were turned into a monster while being half magic body left the control of the caster and aimed at the prey independently. The emitted pressure far surpassed the heavenly dragon that Yue often used before. The five elements magic that formed those bodies were also evolved where now they possessed a worthy wickedness that was clear to see.



“My former world was a world where magic was the foundation. I’m not boasting, but I remember that the development there was remarkable. There was abundant variety of artifact, people flew freely in the sky, they could get in touch with a far away place, they moved using teleportation, even their lifespan could be prolonged by a few hundred years more using magical treatment. Magic and technology that were based from that made that world abundant.”



*pashii!* That light sound resounded and the figure of the lightning dragon vanished. No, that large body changed into a streak of lightning and it moved with lightning speed. At the next moment, it appeared beside Hajime.



(Fast…but, if it’s only as fast as lightning then-)



The dragon raised a roar of thunder while its opened jaw rapidly pulled everything in the surrounding. Even the light stars were swallowed and extinguished inside there, Hajime who was almost got pulled in similarly like the light stars immediately took out several gravity hand grenades to empty air.



The gravity hand grenades that were easily pulled in exploded with a good timing just when they entered inside the mouth of the lightning dragon and generated super gravitational area.



The lightning dragon that swallowed everything while approaching was flattened by the downward pressure that was suddenly generated and passed through below Hajime who was hovering in midair using ‘Air Force’.



“But, what is waiting for the world that is over developed is only their end. Our world too wasn’t an exception to that. Something like a war of the end that happened because of exhausted resources, or sense of values, or possibly because of economical problems or different political idea, those weren’t the cause. The reason was something more, something that couldn’t be helped. Do you know what it was, irregular?”



“ts”



Ehitorujue’s questioned, however Hajime couldn’t answer. He had no composure to answer.



Because after he staved off the lightning dragon, the azure dragon circled right behind him and pressed hard on him along with an immense amount of heat.



In front of him was the meteor shower. Below was a lightning dragon, at left and right were the storm dragon and ice dragon. If he evaded then he would undoubtedly aim from right behind and forced to bear damage that would be hard to disregard.



Therefore, Hajime took out the variable chakram ‘Orestes’ to empty air.



A *kashun* sound came out immediately and wire that was divided into three part formed a round shaped gate. The azure dragon charged straight into the gate, right after that the azure dragon flew out from above the ice dragon that approached from the right side. Hajime had applied ‘Presence Isolation’ to one more variable chakram and made it flew there.



The suddenly appearing azure dragon collided with its natural enemy the ice dragon which caused the ice dragon to roar in agony. And then, the ice dragon glared at Orestes which teleported the azure dragon and breathed out ice and snow. With that the Orestes froze instantly as though it was bathed with liquid nitrogen, right after that it was impacted by a light star and was easily smashed.



Regardless of the roar of the ice dragon and the sound of Orestes getting pulverized, Ehitorujue’s voice still reached Hajime’s ear smoothly.



“They arrived at the truth. The magic technology was developed thoroughly until they could interfere with the information of the world itself, to the material, to life, to the star, to time, to the environment. And then, no matter the era researcher is always unable to restrain their curiosity. They fumbled with the technology that interferes with the truth spreading in the world like playing with a toy…and that became the cause that destroyed the world. Our world was killed by the curiosity of the people who handled magic.”



Hajime neutralized the light stars using Cross Velt. Furthermore, he commanded the Grim Reapers to aim at Ehitorujue. Eagle type Grim Reaper scattered cluster bombs above Ehitorujue. However, the squall of explosive was easily pulverized by the meteor shower fired from the halos, resulting in only sparkling particles scattering around. Hajime’s attacks didn’t reach Ehitorujue at all.



Ehitorujue’s expression didn’t even show any annoyance.



“The truth crumbled and the world was rapidly crumbling…the situation at that time was exactly like a picture of pandemonium in hell. There was nothing that could be done at all. Mankind had no other path other than destruction along with the planet. With the exception of a part of ‘the arrived’.”



Hajime took out all the Orestes that he could control in his attempt to deal with the five heavenly dragons, but Ehitorujue snapped his fingers while talking.



Right after that, several hundred lightning divine spear rained down from the empty air and fried all the Orestes without leaving even dust behind. Furthermore, the lightning that was thoroughly packed inside the spears was released and attacked Hajime from all direction like a spider web. While reinforcing his body with ‘Vajra’, Hajime evacuated hurriedly but he was unable to leave with no damage. His flesh was roasted which harmed his nerve slightly.



There the earth dragon attacked him.



“’The arrived’――these were the people who were able to individually operate the essence of what all of you called as the age of god magic. They, only they were able to discover the method to be saved. That method was the teleportation to another world. Fufu-, isn’t that laughable? After all only the ringleaders who destroyed the world were able to escape from ruin.”



Amidst the reverberation of Ehitorujue’s laugh that was filled with irony, a wire with ores attached at both its ends soared through empty air.



The wire entangled around the approaching stone dragon and lightning dragon midair in many layers. Right after that, a fierce ripple spread from the ores. It was the binding artifact ‘Bola’ that had been strengthened by really far.



Operating together with the ores, the wire part that was also a developed model was fixed directly to the space, so the half magic half physical heavenly dragons were also firmly bounded in place.



The two heavenly dragons roared and rampaged violently to escape from the binding.



Hajime took out Schlagen AA once more and fixed his aim using his magic eye stone and pulled the trigger.



Spark traveled the barrel and Schlagen AA roared, the bullet then flew into the mouth of the lightning dragon and advanced forward without paying any heed to the lightning and destroyed the magic stone of the dragon.



At the same time, six bullets that were shot from Donner along the same trajectory gouged further the hole inside the stone dragon’s mouth that was hollowed by the concentrated fire of the Cross Velts. The bullets were instantly petrified and became brittle stone, but even so, the bullets advanced inside the stone dragon and the last bullet shot through the magic stone without getting petrified.



The last bullet was a bullet coated with sealing stone. Hajime only had a bit of it remained because he wasn’t frugal in using them for the weapons of Shia and others or his large shield, this bullet coated with sealing stone was something that he needed to think carefully before using.



Hajime splendidly defeated two heavenly dragons, but because of that his feet stopped moving. The compensation for that was large.



“Like that ‘the arrived’ including me arrived in this world. At that time we were surprised. After all, this world was so primitive that it shouldn’t even be compared with our world. Mighty creatures with special power were running rampant, while mankind was hiding in shadow like cave or hole in the ground while living barely scraping by.”



Ehitorujue had a distant look in reminiscence while waving his hand.



Immediately Hajime’s legs were fixed in a place altogether with the space. Even though he was concentrating on his story but he perfectly grasped the instant Hajime’s feet stopped, a compressed space in block shape that was the same like the fixed space which captured Metsurai Disaster completely seized Hajime.



(No good-)



Unease showed in Hajime’s expression. He immediately converted his magic power into impact to attempt to break the fixed space.



But, the opponent wasn’t that sweet to let such opening escaped.



Storm dragon roared while attacking the unmoving Hajime. Its jaw swallowed Hajime before closing with a snap. The wind blades and pebbles contained inside its body mercilessly assaulted Hajime. The damage went through to Hajime who persisted using ‘Vajra’. Blood sprayed everywhere and graphic unpleasant sound *gokibeki-* resounded.



Inside the storm of violence that was equivalent to a torture, Hajime fixed the aim of Schlagen AA along with a yell of fighting spirit and tore the storm dragon from inside its body.



Ehitorujue continued his talk without showing any care that the monster he created was killed.



“In that kind of world, we ‘the arrived’ decided to cultivate it. We exterminated the monsters that had lived since the ancient times, and granted wisdom to the native people. The small village turned into town before long and then became a city, and then before we realized it had become a country. At that period we had already been revered as gods. We used the secret technique of the truth and converted the religious faith into power, we attempted to reinforce and sublimate our soul was also around that period.”



Hajime smashed the storm dragon and blasted out from inside it, his body became soaked in blood which made his appearance looked wretched.



But, the ice dragon roared without even any time to breathe.



Hajime threw all the ‘Bola’ that he had toward the azure dragon that was approaching from the opposite direction, he also held the dragon back further using Cross Velts, ordered the Grim Reapers for concentrated fire, then he turned toward the ice dragon’s opened jaw and aimed Schlagen AA. Instantly Schlagen AA was freezing with dreadful momentum from its tip.



“Coordinate attack huh-“



It appeared the ice dragon was able to directly lower the temperature at the coordinate it targeted. It was an ability that the ice dragon Yue handled didn’t have.



Hajime was already unable to pull the trigger, the freezing kept moving with the momentum that almost froze even his artificial arm. Furthermore, with Ehitorujue’s instruction, a meteor shower and light apostles rushed Hajime’s left side with good timing.



Although he was able to somehow repel back only the light apostles using the suicide bombing Grim Reapers and Cross Velts, but he was unable to neutralize the whole meteor shower, Hajime received a direct hit on his left arm.



Although the armor of the artificial arm slightly decreased the damage he received, the Schlagen AA that he unintentionally let go because of the impact was sucked into the jaw of the ice dragon. Like that it was obvious how the artifact would end up. The Schlagen AA turn into little pieces at the same time when the pure white freezing ice dragon closed its jaw.



“A few thousand years later after that, this world became greatly developed. But, as though in inverse proportion, one of ‘the arrived’, and the one more person lost their will to live, regardless of how they had transcended the truth of death they ended their own life. I was unable to understand that but…the last person who stopped prolonging his life said this, ‘It’s already enough’. In the end, the remaining ‘arrived’ became only me.”



Hajime threw countless grenades at the surrounding and immediately shot them.



Right after that, a flame blast was generated in the air which created a crimson flame wall between Hajime and the ice dragon. For an instant, the sight of the ice dragon was obstructed, but something like that was completely swallowed into its jaw instantly like nothing.



But, after that flame blast cleared up, at the other side was a gigantic weapon――a gatling pile bunker held by Hajime was there.



At the next moment, a crimson spark crackled and two-ton giant stakes fired with a rate of twenty shot per second were fired and turned into flashes. The barrage of giant stakes that should be called as a crimson wall rushed the ice dragon from the front, coupled with the gravitational pull by the gravity spot in its mouth, the giant stakes stabbed into the dragon’s large mouth without any deviation.



The freezing ability of the ice dragon was instantly freezing the giant stakes, but because of their force the giant stakes couldn’t be resisted, they advanced unstoppable and gouged in. And then, one of the giant stakes hit the magic stone inside and splendidly succeeding in destroying the dragon. While raising scream of death agony, the ice dragon changed into mere mist and dispersed.



“I became the last one, since then how many months and years had lapsed then…was it a thousand or five thousand years…I don’t remember anymore but, day by day I watched the humans came to me lifting up prayer and offering, and then one day, suddenly I thought. ――Let’s destroy them.”



Hajime directed the cannon turret of the gatling pile bunker toward the azure dragon. The rushing meteor shower and light apostles were all blown away by the Cross Velts and Grim Reapers.



Like that, he turned toward the azure dragon who even now was almost finished burning the many Bolas binding itself and he pulled the trigger――just before he could do that, Hajime suddenly felt a chill and leaped away from that spot.



It appeared that his choice was correct. The place where Hajime was at a moment before was pierced by several dozen lightning divine spears, they spread immense thunders everywhere.



It was just a hair’s breadth. While trickling out cold sweat and blood, Hajime sent a sidelong glance at Ehitorujue. Ehitorujue was still looking at empty space with faraway look while talking about his path in the past. And yet, his attacks were still tormenting Hajime accurately with superb timing so there was nothing more irritating than this.



After being toyed around until this far, Hajime confirmed that Ehitorujue was sensing him accurately and he made a frustrated expression. At the same time, he decided that first, he should slaughter the last remaining azure dragon and so he was moving the gatling pile bunker toward it.



But, as expected it seemed he had let escape the timing for a sure kill.



The azure dragon that was restrained using all of Hajime’s bola roared fiercely. At that moment, the crimson ripple was enveloped by blue flame. The lit blue flame traveled along the bola’s wire before rushing all over everywhere and the blue flame swallowed everything.



Explosive sound resounded and blue beams of light illuminated the space, amidst that Ehitorujue showed an ecstatic expression. With Yue’s beautiful face, that smile emitted an amazing sex appeal,, but for Hajime it only made his blood boiled without end.



“You understand right? Just like how a man wants to defile woman, just like how someone wants to step on fresh snow, beautiful things, those precious things that you desperately piled up, they give off their true beauty when they are broken. The pleasure you obtained from that is something that is really difficult to be substituted by anything. That time when I trampled everything that I had protected the whole time for several thousand years let me tasted unimaginable sweetness. The people screaming, the shriek that asked for help from me…even now, that’s the only thing that I remember clearly.”



All the bolas were burned to nothing. The azure dragon resumed its advance with blazing rage.



Hajime was going to make the dragon into the prey of the gatling pile bunker right from the front, but then the space all around Hajime shook.



“――”



Omni-directional space blasting.



While holding his breath, Hajime leaped out from the encirclement before the space could generate shockwave.



A severe earthquake.



Although Hajime at least avoided a direct hit, he got hit by the after wave and blood sprayed everywhere grandly from Hajime’s wounds.



“Guu”



Hajime unintentionally groaned and his expression warped, there was a flickering azure flame at the corner of his sight. Contrary to the approaching heat, an ice lump was sliding down his spine.



He tried to use ‘Air Force’ to escape while reinforcing his body with ‘Vajra’, but the meteor swarm whirled and danced boisterously in anticipation of that and blocked Hajime’s path of escape.



“Even though I have forgotten completely how long I have lived, only the pleasure I felt at that time when everything crumbled is unforgettable. Therefore, I decided. That this world is my toy.”



Ehitorujue’s gaze finally returned back from the past.



He faced Hajime who was trying to break through the dance of the meteor shower using Donner and Cross Velts, and then he snapped his fingers.



That was the signal for the explosion.



All the meteors following Hajime like a whirlwind exploded simultaneously. The generated shockwave was equal with the hand grenade that Hajime used. Hajime immediately used Cross Velts to lay out barrier and furthermore the Grim Reapers used their body as a shield in their master’s danger to soften the impact even if just for a bit.



Hajime who was swallowed by flame blasts and the light was swallowed by the fully opened mouth of the azure dragon. The jaw of azure flame closed with a snap. Everything that was touched would be mercilessly returned to ash by the hell fire of the highest class of magic. Thinking normally, it was impossible to survive after getting eaten by that flame.



However, the torso of the flaming azure dragon――inside the azure flame there was a shining crimson that showed Hajime’s survival. There were four Cross Velts around Hajime. They connected to each other using string of magic power and laid out a barrier of space isolation, ‘Four Point Barrier’.



But, in compensation for that, the surface of the Cross Velts was melting down second by second. The seven Cross Velts that Hajime directly controlled were naturally enchanted with ‘Vajra’ and also coated with sealing stone, yet even so these Cross Velts couldn’t endure. It was something that he understood, but as expected the heat of this dragon far surpassed the dragon that Yue used.



“Guh, don’t, underestimate mee-!!”



Inside the stomach of the blue heavenly dragon, a voice that paused intermittently yet filled with tenacious will resounded. The astonishing thing was that even with the laid out space isolation barrier Hajime was still enveloped in a lot of flame.



It seemed that this azure dragon had penetrating flame the same like the Divine Flame slipped into it. Scorched by that flame, Hajime was stepping forward while trickling greasy sweats, he took out Orestes which made a gate that connected the inside and outside the barrier. Ahead of the gate was the azure dragon’s magic stone.



Donner fired crimson flash along with bursting sound, the bullet passed through the gate and pierced through the sea of azure flame. The magic bullet coated with sealing stone accurately shot the magic stone of the azure dragon. The magic stone became little pieces with an explosive sound, at the same time the blue flame was dispersing.



“Yes, everything is my toy, irregular.”



A sinister sound that he had already heard many times from Ehitorujue echoed. The sound of a finger snap.



As expected, the dispersing azure flame wriggled like living thing, it intruded smoothly into the four Cross Velts surrounding Hajime.



Right after that,



“Gaah”



Hajime’s short scream accompanied a grand flame blast rising up. The four Cross Velts ruptured from their inside. The penetrating Divine Flame caused chain explosions from the bursting bullet loaded inside. Followed by crimson ripples, grand and countless shockwaves and scattering Divine Flame tormented Hajime thoroughly from four directions.



Hajime immediately scattered hand grenades. It was for the sake of drinking god water and forcefully making an opening. As expected, his damage had reached a level that he couldn’t ignore.



But, the wind of death caressed his skin chillingly at that time. Hajime’s instinct was ringing the alarm bell in full.



Right after that, the crimson wall that bloomed fully at the surrounding from Hajime’s hand grenades was pierced by a blowing down wind.



Hajime obeyed his instinct’s command and twisted his body, and right beside him a dislocated space passed through.



At the same time, his left hand that took out god water was fixed in space. It was a perfect timing that took advantage of the opening when Hajime took evasive action. The next move was also the same. The Lightning divine spear flew out from empty air and shot down the god water.



“Damn-――”



Hajime raised his voice unintentionally, but it was already too late. The god water had been lost from Hajime’s hand. On the same occasion, his artificial hand was also pierced and his palm dissolved.



Hajime immediately repaired his artificial hand using transmutation while leaping away in order to avoid the rushing meteor shower.



“Shit-, even though that’s the last god water-“



A swearing leaked out. Ehitorujue who heard that lifted the corner of his lips.



And then, he lifted his hand before dropping that hand quietly pointing at Hajime. Immediately, light swelled up explosively and light star shot out from the halos like missile moving in an arch with light trailing behind.



Hajime took out his gatling pile bunker, aimed it at Ehitorujue and then he charged forward while firing.



From above, like stars falling from the night sky, radiant stars were raining down, the Grim Reapers whose number had decreased considerably before one knows used their body as a shield, several Cross Velts laid out barrier above Hajime’s route, with those the momentum of Hajime’s charge didn’t stop. Even while that was happening, like a countdown going down, the autonomic weapons of Hajime’s quality products were bursting, their fragments scattered everywhere.



But, as though mocking that determination of Hajime who was forced to make those sacrifices…



“What do you think the devil and demi-human are?”



Such question resounded from right behind Hajime.



Hajime felt a shudder running through his spine. He used the intense recoil of his artificial hand to rotate at high speed and fired Donner behind him without even confirming anything.



But, there was no one there, in exchange a presence appeared at Hajime’s left-hand side where he was holding the gatling pile bunker. Hajime opened his eyes wide while sending his gaze there, at the same time a hand gently caressed the artifact.



And then, just like what happened at the devil king castle, the gatling pile bunker was easily returned to dust.



The one who was there was Ehitorujue. From his three layers of halos, in his back now there was only the first layer of halo, he skipped over even Hajime’s perception and his figure appeared in very close range.



(Teleport without using gate…as expected, he can actually do something like that.)



Hajime’s eyes narrowed from how one of the concerns that he harbored came true. It appeared that the magic which allowed the lightning divine spear to appeared suddenly from the empty air and teleported the artifact he possessed――’Heaven Existence’ could also be used for teleporting the caster themselves. And then, Ehito could also turn artifact into dust just by touching them.



The figure of Ehitorujue vanished quietly once more.



At the same time, a chill ran on his back.



Hajime fired bursting bullet behind from the elbow of his artificial arm, but the light emitted from the halo blocked it. Ehitorujue’s arm was swung down without even paying any attention to Hajime’s counterattack.



Sword of light attacked Hajime following the trajectory of that arm. Hajime rotated using the impact from firing bursting bullet and back-stepped to evade. He took a distance of more than ten meters within an instant using his super speed but…



“–!?”



A diagonal laceration was carved from Hajime’s shoulder until his flank. Even though he should have gotten out already from the range of the sword yet he was still hit. Hajime’s face warped in pain while his severe gaze stabbed Ehitorujue.



“No need to be shocked. This is called as ‘Divine Sword’, a magic sword that can freely contract and expand, it also can jump through space to attack. It can penetrate your defense is because it also has the penetrating ability like ‘Divine Flame’.”



Hajime had been reduced to a tragic appearance that was obvious at a glance. Ehitorujue was explaining to such Hajime who was breathing roughly while his hand was caressing along the divine sword.



That composed expression expressed how Hajime’s fang couldn’t reach him at all.



In contrast Hajime was all tattered. His black coat that was weaved with metal fiber which was stronger than even armor had become just like scrapped rag, the clothes under it was heavily soaked from absorbing blood. His skin that was visible from the gaps of the torn clothes was dyed bright red, his white hair was especially soaked with blood color from the fresh blood pouring out from his head, just looking at Hajime right now felt painful. The blood trickling down his head was like tears of blood.



Even the equal fight when the two fought a battle of resource was easily tilted completely into Ehito’s favor when he used age of god magic consecutively. The many artifacts that were the greatest trait of Hajime’s specialty were also being mostly destroyed.



What were left with Hajime was Donner & Schlag, Cross Velts, and then Grim Reapers…



“Hmm, it has become a little bit bothersome now.”



Ehito swung his divine sword. Not even afterimage could be seen from his hand motion. It wasn’t even clear whether he had swung the magic sword or not. But, the result was obvious. The Cross Velts and Grim Reapers that had been decreased until nearly fifty machines were cruelly turned into small pieces before they exploded everywhere they were.



“…”



What remained was only three Cross Velts that Hajime directly controlled. The army of demon king had been completely annihilated, even the crosses that symbolized death fell on the ground. Now Hajime only possessed mainly grenades of various kinds. Most likely Ehitorujue was intentionally aiming to destroy the artifacts in order to grant Hajime despair.



“Well, such thing doesn’t matter. Rather than that, I talked about devil and demi-human. What do you think they are?”



Without even showing particular care about the several hundred artifacts that he had cut apart instantly, Ehitorujue repeated his previous question. It appeared the talk of Ehitorujue still wasn’t over. He toyed around with his divine sword while staring at Hajime who looked like he could fall anytime with a wide repulsive grin.



“…Aren’t they…haa haa…the native here.”



Hajime answered the question in order to recover even for a little in this second opening he was given.



“No, you are wrong. The native people of this world are only the ‘human’. Whether the devil or the demi-human, they are the illegitimate children created by my magic technology.”



“…So you even, guh, synthesizing?”



“Fufu-, you have fast understanding. The devil and demi-human are synthetic organisms created by the combination of my monster and human. They are my genuine creation.”



‘Why did you do such thing?’ Perhaps Ehitorujue surmised that unasked question of Hajime, his tongue was moving smoothly to answer.



“No matter how much I was trying to sublimate my soul using faith and secret technique, no matter how much restoration and improvement I attempted on the body, the long several millenniums brought my body to its limit. Naturally, I searched for new body but…there was no flesh that could accept the soul of god.”



“If there is none, then just make one…huh?”



“It really helps that you have a quick understanding. Devil has high aptitude with magic factor, and the demi-human has powerful physic, they each came from me combining human with primitive organisms that possessed those essential aspects. I also tried creating the likes of dragon people by combining those two aspects but….they were a failure. They could only be used for side entertainment, like how the strongest race became persecuted.”



Just how many sacrifices came out along the course of those experiments? Even Hajime couldn’t help but sympathize with the people in the past. To say nothing of the fact that the reason of the persecution toward Tio and others was merely this guy venting his anger, knowing that caused Hajime’s killing intent to intensify further.



“In that process, I also created the currently existing monsters and apostles, but because of some unknown factor, in the end I was unable to obtain a body that could possibly become my vessel. Although some could endure to a certain degree, they would soon self-destruct.”



“…So the Holy Precincts…was because you had no vessel”



“Fufu. Correct. This place is so I can continue to exist only as soul and also a place where I can use my strength. Here I was enjoying the game while waiting. Extremely rarely there would be people with aptitude like Aruvheit or the ‘liberators’ that were born.”



Based on the truth that Hajime was told, it seemed that the people who were called as ‘true ancestor’ like Yue or Shia were more accurately people with aptitude. Although even the people with aptitude in the past like the liberators were insufficient as Ehitorujue’s vessel.



Hajime’s eyes narrowed quietly.



“Like, that…haa haa, three hundred years ago…you finally, discovered it, huh”



“Yes. At that time my heart danced for the first time after a few hundred years. Although, my vessel was immediately hidden after that…even though at that time I had even personally granted her the title as ‘miko’ specially. You know, at that time I was driven by fury that I even destroyed several countries unintentionally while destroying the vampire country. After that I thought of the possibility of another miko being born once more before I was able to finally calm down.”



Ehitorujue swept his divine sword. The halo on his back and the halos at the distance visible above the throne began to shine brilliantly.



“Let me say my thanks once more, irregular. You discovered my vessel and made me enjoyed myself until this much, you have truly done a great service. As the prize, I’ll consign you to oblivion personally by my hand.”



Platinum magic power painted over everything.



Hajime too also emitted his crimson magic power, he readied Donner-Schlag and lined up the three Cross Velts behind him.



A beat passed.



The figure of Ehitorujue disappeared.



Hajime fired the readied Donner & Schlag as they were. The launched flashes passed through the last Orestes that was placed in front of the gun muzzles and reappeared behind him.



Sure enough, there was Ehitorujue there.



However, without any hurry Ehitorujue surprisingly cut apart the bullets that came flying from Orestes with his divine sword.



Although Yue was a prodigy in magic but her close quarter combat ability was lower than average. Based on Ehitorujue’s feat just now, it seemed that because of the possession the body’s physical ability and battle skill were increased up like a joke.



The penetrating divine sword stretched toward the frowning Hajime. The sword flash that was impossible to defend against was somehow evaded by Hajime bending backward. At the same time the Cross Velts fired burst bullets wildly.



Those bullets were shot down by the light stars fired from the halo. The spreading ripples of impact bloomed everywhere between Hajime and Ehitorujue.



“There is nothing to feel surprised about. This is my original sword art that I learned for killing time. The twin large swords art of the apostle is also based on my swordsmanship. I can do not only magic you know?”



“Chih, so what.”



“Fufu-. At first, I put distance and stole the artifacts of you who were desperately struggling like plucking off your arms and legs. Next is close quarter combat, that’s how it is. There is no hope for you no matter what you try, I’ll teach that to you personally. How are you feeling getting overwhelmed with one hand by someone who was talking leisurely about the past? Hmm?”



Saying that Ehitorujue cut apart the shockwaves themselves and charged forward.



Hajime rapid fired Donner & Schlag. The bullets that he used were Living Bullet. Furthermore they were coated with sealing stone.



But, at the next moment Ehitorujue’s figure vanished as expected. And then, he appeared instantly at Hajime’s side.



Hajime who foreseen that used the recoil of his artificial arm to throw away his body. Immediately following that, the bullets that Hajime fired before this flew out from the space around Ehitorujue. Hajime understood that Ehitorujue would teleport using Heaven Existence so he made use of Orestes to teleport the bullets.



A storm of flashes that aimed at the moment Ehitorujue teleported. No matter even if it was Ehitorujue, it seemed that he would get drilled through by the bullets before he could teleport once more.



However, the moment the bullets impacted, the arm of Ehitorujue that was holding the divine sword vanished. No, that arm was moving so fast that it looked like it vanished. The sword moved flexibly like a whip, and sword lines rushed around Ehitorujue as though a barrier was layered surrounding him.



As the result, the bullets were wrecked into pieces. The sword was swung with a speed that even the Living Bullets’ trajectory correction couldn’t follow. Even the perception skill that Hajime had could only perceive the sword slightly as a streak of light. It was a terrifying speed.



“To be able to read my movement in this short time…that prediction came from experience rather than sense I guess. That’s really something. But, in front of my ‘God Speed’ that is still too slow.”



God Speed――it was the magic that Kaori used limitedly. But Ehitorujue used it with more refinement. It was beyond the pale that he was able to cut apart twenty shots of electromagnetically accelerated bullets that approached from a meter. Before this when he instantly cut apart several hundred Cross Velts and Grim Reapers was surely also because his sword attacks that were done within shortened time.



“Now then, how many artifacts you have left? Or else have you used up all of your plans? If not then you can use them all. I’ll crush everything you have and dye your brave face with despair!”



Ehitorujue used Heaven Existence.



Instantly, he appeared right in front of Hajime’s face.



“Kuh”



The sword flashes that were swung while Hajime groaned were ten times. All of those were evaded by Hajime who mostly relied only on his instinct. But, his dodging couldn’t be called as perfect with how he was unable to defend, he was grazed, or even thinly sliced all over his body.



The recoil of Hajime’s artificial hand forcefully threw away his body to an angle that was normally impossible. Hajime rotated like spinning wheel while desperately taking distance, during that time he randomly scattered a lot of grenades from inside ‘Treasure Warehouse II’.



Many of the grenades were cut apart by the lengthening divine sword, and destroyed by the meteors from the halo. The grenades that weren’t even allowed to explode were scattered as sparkling particles and fell on the ground.



Ehitorujue laughed disgustingly to that useless effort of Hajime who couldn’t even buy time while teleporting consecutively. He appeared and then vanished, appeared and then vanished. Just like an illusion. It was like he was being omnipresence around Hajime.



And then the divine sword that reached regardless of distance carved multiple layers in the air. Although Hajime avoided lethal wound each time that happened, wounds were mass produced with certainty on his body. He also counterattacked with the combination of Donner & Schlag, Orestes, and Cross Velts, but in front of the elusive Heaven Existence and God Speed, Hajime was unable to inflict even one telling blow.



The second and third layer of the halos and the halo behind Ehitorujue were dyeing the white space with platinum light by endlessly firing meteor shower. However naturally those meteors were automatically avoiding Ehitorujue himself and rushed only Hajime.



Hajime was clenching his teeth while shooting back, he was staving off the storm of death sometimes with grenade, sometimes with Cross Velt, and sometimes with Orestes. Amidst that he was trying to somehow arrest Ehitorujue’s movement but…



He couldn’t reach.



Hajime was being overwhelmed even in close quarter combat just like Ehitorujue planned. Each time he was attacked, blood splashed while he was being rapidly cornered, just like a chess match.



“What’s wrong? Won’t you use your trump card(godslaying)? If you use it while praying, perhaps you will be lucky and reach this body you know?”



“Shu, shut uup-!”



Hajime was already holding out only by his guts. Even the vocabulary of the words that he returned to Ehitorujue’s provocation was poor. Perhaps because Hajime was bleeding out too much, or perhaps because of the limit break that he continued to use, Hajime’s eyes were beginning to strangely get out of focus and looked blank.



“Hmm. You don’t look like you will take out a new artifact, your body is also on the verge of breaking apart…are you waiting for a favorable opportunity?”



Ehitorujue snapped his fingers. Lightning divine spear was flying out from empty air.



Its target was naturally the heavily wounded Hajime. Even now it felt like his consciousness would fly away, his body felt like it would crumble down anytime. Even so, he still somehow avoided a direct hit, really what an astonishing survival instinct.



But, even his resistance only went that far.



The lightning divine spears that fired rapidly destroyed the last Cross Velts and Orestes altogether, on the same occasion the lightning the spears contained were also liberated nearby Hajime.



“GUAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA-“



Terrific impact and thunderous sound, and then lightning hit Hajime. Hajime screamed and then fell on the ground with a smoking body.



Hajime bounced several times on the chalk white ground before collapsing face down. Then blood dripped out. Hajime’s tragic appearance that had been chopped up, beaten many times, and also grilled thoroughly, just from a glance he already looked like a corpse. It was hard to judge him as alive.



Ehitorujue descended soundlessly in front of Hajime. Looking at Hajime who was licking the ground in an unsightly state, while wondering if it was the end with this, Ehitorujue lifted up his divine sword in order to deal the finishing blow with an expression like a child whose toy was taken away.



But, ahead of his gaze Hajime’s finger twitched.



“Hou”



Ehitorujue reflexively leaked out an admiring voice. Even during that time Hajime’s body was moving and his body was rising up while dripping blood was dirtying the chalk white ground.



“Even with the majesty of god engraved to your flesh and bones, you are still going to stand up?”



Ehitorujue’s words were replied by Hajime with intermittent words that sounded like they were going to die out anytime along with his heartbeat.



“I’ll, keep…saying it. You are…not a, god. Rather, even, compared…to the ‘human’ fighting on the surface right now…you’re weak.”



“What are you basing on saying that? And with that heavily wounded appearance at that. Even though not even a single one of your power reach me.”



Ehitorujue made an exasperated expression, wondering if Hajime would still bluffing even after reaching this point of time.



“…Indeed, your strength, is astonishing. …Since I, got out, of the abyss, I have…never, felt death…this close”



“Hmph, if you understand――”



“But, that’s all.”



Hajime cut off Ehitorujue’s words. The focus of his eyes was disappearing. However, anyone would understand if they looked from close by. Far inside the wavering eyes, a flame that would never be snuffed out was residing there. As though to display that, strength was filling Hajime’s words little by little.



“Inside you, there is no…will to overwhelm others. That’s why, no matter how much…strength, that you show me, my heart…won’t waver. ――It’s like you are not scary.”



“…Are you making excuse?”



Ehitorujue talked provocatively, however, this times it was Hajime who was talking with a distant look. About the strong people that he met, or he knew in this world.



“I, know. …even though she is the weakest race, yet with a single feeling…that fellow stepped into a deadly no man’s land.”



Her face looked like she was going to cry, even so ‘to be together’, just for that little wish that rabbit ear girl kept running desperately



“Even though…despair, was thrust before her eyes…she just wouldn’t break, a fellow that continued to believe in hope.”



With a single feeling, even when no one believed other than her, she didn’t abandon hope. An earnest girl who in the end even chose to change her body to get close to him.



“For the sake of her comrade…in order to protect…a fellow that can use her body as a shield.”



Just how many times had he been protected by her? Even though usually she would screw around, but when push came to shove she would risk her life more than anyone, a wise woman with deep emotion.



“Even at the verge of death…a fellow that can think of her best friend, as the most.”



Surely, she was the most ‘girlish’ among his comrades. Despite so, she would take up weapon for the sake of someone, even many times at the verge of death, the one who she would think at the end would always be her best friend, it would always be somebody else. A kind girl who was too kind.



“Even when, the world changed…even when her own naivety was thrust before her, that fellow didn’t cast away her own dignity.”



Hesitating, scared, distressed, hurt, even so she didn’t stop being what she determined as herself. The teacher who admonished Hajime who only kept pushing on so he would stop and looked back.



“Even though she is just a little girl without any strength, that girl can risk her life in order to stop her idiot father.”



The time they spent together didn’t even reach a month. She was also just a four-year-old little girl. Despite so, she worried for her injured mother, she personally went to meet the father who informed her of their parting and spoke out, and in the end, that child could convey her feeling without taking even a step back against her rampaging father.



And then,



“…And then, even with her body taken, still, that fellow is continuing to fight.”



He believed. Yes, he believed. At her strength.



Hajime’s gaze, the gaze of someone who had been overwhelmed until he couldn’t move even a single finger and was almost died, pierced Ehitorujue.



The person whom that gaze was directed at didn’t notice himself. Of how the shining flame deep inside those eyes that were peaceful like a calm water surface yet dark like the abyss, was overpowering himself to shrink away with a step back.



“Even the monsters in the abyss emitted overwhelming killing intent and survival instinct. But, there is nothing in you. You are empty. Surely, since the time the things you have piled up together with your comrades were destroyed, you have been empty.”



Hajime stood up completely. In his hands, Donner & Schlag were clutched tightly.



“Your words were loud and clear. In short, you don’t learn anything since the past, you cannot even endure loneliness, however you are scared to even die…the point is that you are just a spoiled brat right?”



The meaning of “enough already” that Ehitorujue’s last comrade spoke was surely, because he believed that even if they let go of the hand of the people they guided in this world, it was enough, they would still be able to live prosperously.



That person was surely thinking of their destroyed home world, that existences like them who had touched the truth weren’t needed anymore, and then, seeing the activity of this world, surely that person thought that there was nothing left that he needed to teach to the people of this world.



Not noticing that feeling, unable to even sympathize, not learning anything from the past, scared of the fear of death despite being able to interfere with truth, and then unable to endure the loneliness, he went into a rampage. In the end, the existence named Ehitorujue was still ‘childish’ no matter how long he had been alive.



“…Fuh, is this a scheme to make my mind waver with that kind of provocation? After all it will be the end if your trump card fails to reach me. What a moving endeavor. But, at this rate your ‘godslaying’ cannot possibly work.”



That was why, he didn’t understand the meaning of what Hajime was talking about. Exactly the same like how he didn’t understand the meaning of the words of his comrade in the far past.



Hajime slowly drew back one of his feet and took his stance. Even though he was already at the death’s door, a supreme will was overflowing from that body.



“Perhaps.”



A calm word of affirmation.



But, right after that…



“That’s only if I am still like before yeah-!”



Immense power burst out from Hajime. It was incomparable with his ‘Supreme Break’ until now. A torrent of power that was equal with several times his former power whirled with Hajime at the center. It was just like a tornado of level F5. The crimson color got deeper into a deep crimson, the space was rumbling as though it was screaming.



“What the-“



Hajime who he thought to be almost died just now suddenly exploded out with power so great at this point of time, for the first time Ehitorujue’s calm expression crumbled. That was undoubtedly an expression of shock.



Giving that expression a glance, Hajime stepped forward. No, his figure was erased.



Where he appeared was right in front of Ehitorujue’s face. Ehitorujue gazed in astonishment.



Just by being fast wouldn’t be able to surpass Ehitorujue’s perception. No matter how much Hajime was strengthened, it would still be impossible by nature. But, even so there were many ways to fight. Just who decided that an instant space teleportation was the technique exclusive for god?



“Haah!!”



“Nuu!?”



The hand of Hajime that was holding Donner softly shifted the hand of Ehitorujue that was stabbing toward Hajime. At the same time, the bullet that flew out from Schlag ricocheted on the ground and aimed at Ehitorujue’s heart.



Naturally, Ehitorujue escaped with Heaven Existence. Instantly, a raging killing intent blew from behind him.



“-!? You bastard, as expected, you use Heaven Existence!?”



“Who knows, I wonder about that?”



Two gunshots resounded. However, there were twenty streaks of flashes that attacked Ehito violently. Half of them were slashed by the divine sword, but he then judged that he wouldn’t be able to deal with the rest of Hajime’s acrobatics rapid shooting that Ehitorujue escaped using further space teleportation.



But, at his next teleportation Ehitorujue saw it. Before his eyes one floating bullet vanished quietly, at the next instant, Hajime appeared at that bullet’s former spot. Yes, it was as though the position of Hajime and the bullet was exchanged.



――Special bullet Exise Bullet



This special bullet that was transmuted from combined space-sublimation magic had the ability to exchange the coordinate position of the starting point and each bullet. Bullets so many like the number of stars in the sky had been scattered in this battlefield since the start of the battle until this moment. But, not all the bullets were attacking the enemy. Several bullets among them were scattering to the whole area and floated midair to become Hajime’s teleporting coordinate.



Ehitorujue used his divine sword to intercept Hajime who appeared in front of him.



However,



“Mu-“



He struck empty air. The blade passed through a bit in front of Hajime. With a returning strike Ehito attempted to shower Hajime with slashes――but when he noticed, Hajime had already slipped right in front of his face once more.



Hajime rushed at the opening of Ehito’s mind. He read Ehito’s breathing and made his timing and distance to miss. Hajime also intentionally disturbed his presence to make it difficult for Ehito to perceive his state. He used taijutsu to give an illusion to Ehito’s sense of distance. The more sensitive the senses of the opponent, the more these techniques could be used to throw the opponent’s perception out of whack. Furthermore,



――Illusion projection artifact ‘Novum Idola’



This artifact layered shadow on the user, it strangely shifted the user’s position and enveloped the image-presence-magic power-etc of the user, at the same time it interfered with the opponent’s perception and made them misrecognized the camouflage and the truth. Hajime’s figure and presence that blurred in two or three layers, combined with Hajime’s own taijutsu realized a close quarter combat that was like an illusion.



“You bastard-, after this far, you still show new cards――”



Ehitorujue’s discarded voice was cut off. Seeing this person who had become that ragged, showered in words of humiliation, and made to snuggle really close to death, yet he was still preserving his cards until this time, as expected it was beyond the imagination of even god. For example even if someone actually was still hiding some plan inside their heart, but in a situation where it wasn’t strange that they could die anytime, the courage needed not to expose their hidden hand was already something that surpassed the realm of human.



Ehitorujue who felt a slight shudder going through his back unleashed attacks that were like surging wave.



“OOOOOOOOOOO-!!”



Hajime’s war cry reverberated, at the same time a crimson flash exploded like a solar flare.



Even when Ehitorujue swung his divine sword and fired meteor shower from his halos, his disarrayed perception couldn’t capture Hajime. Hajime’s attack was also becoming closer and closer to hitting before he noticed, that fact was already a godly feat that surpassed superhuman feat――no, perhaps it was more fitting for Hajime for this to be called as a demonic feat.



Hajime bared his fang using everything that he had analyzed and pounded into his body from the battle until now!



Ehitorujue teleported consecutively once more. However, Hajime who was starting to grasp his teleporting habit rapidly approached within zero comma several seconds. Hajime wasn’t using only the speed of the coordinate exchange and his discernment. His raw speed that was continuing to increase second by second was also progressively entering the realm of god speed.



Even so, the sword flashes of Ehitorujue was impossible to defend against, therefore he possessed overwhelming advantage against Hajime in close quarter combat, was how it was supposed to be.



*GAKIN-*



“Wha-!?”



This time it was Ehitorujue who leaked out a shocked voice along with the resounding hard sound.



That was only natural. The divine sword that should pass through everything except Hajime was blocked by Schlag after all.



With no delay the right Donner aimed at Ehitorujue. The fired crimson flash was evaded by Ehitorujue using teleportation by a hairbreadth with shocked expression pasted still on his face.



“Just, what in the world――”



“It’s only transmutation.”



Hajime answered concisely without telling everything.



The cause that blocked the penetrating ability of the divine sword came from the transmutation that was done on Schlag.



――Soul magic neutralization artifact ‘Delischanors’



If the attack could pass through everything except the target using soul magic, then he only needed to enchant Schlag using ‘Soul Reproduction’ to create a pseudo soul in it. Originally this was a ‘decoy’ artifact that was produced from the assumption that the ‘Divine Statement’ which forced a command on the selected soul in subconscious level couldn’t be defended using Miledy’s artifact, but it was also sufficient to misalign the target of the divine sword.



And then, the decoys that were applied with Delischanors weren’t just Donner & Schlag.



Ehitorujue swung the divine sword at the stepping forward Hajime, which was blocked by the muzzle of Schlag. At the same time,



*DOPAN-!!*



A single gunshot. The flying bullet knocked back the divine sword that should be in a state where its penetrating ability was activated. Yes, what was enchanted with Delischanors wasn’t just Schlag. The bullets were also rejecting the penetration ability!



“Irregular-“



“You talk too much, small fry.”



The impact from the divine sword getting knocked back forcefully made Ehito’s posture to form a one-handed banzai, Ehitorujue who was making a humiliated expression fired meteors from his halo.



But, as though knowing that move ahead, Cross Velts and Donner’s bullet barrage repelled them. Hajime smoothly closed the distance and launched a fierce round kick. That attack, finally, run into the solar plexus of the god that Hajime had no hope to touch before! The kick that had ‘Strong Leg’ and ‘Impact Conversion’ applied to it was extremely intense. Ehitorujue’s body bent forward into ‘>’ shape and he was blown away.



“Kuh”



Hajime pursued, but as expected Ehitorujue didn’t intend to allow him going that far and used Heaven Existence to make his escape.



Yes, he escaped. Different from all his evasion until now from the thinking that it was inexcusable for god’s body to be touched, now he was purely escaping. Of course, Ehitorujue had automatic regeneration. Even so, that he escaped was because his heart was shaken. It was an instinctual action.



Because of that, the humiliation that was welling up in his chest was great. As though to display that, the expression of Ehitorujue distorted grandly.



“You-, your new artifact, that power-. You bastard, you didn’t fight me at full strength!”



“Oi oi, what kind of gullible fellow would believe his enemy’s words. Of course, that was obviously a lie.”



While unfolding an offense and defense against Hajime who was saying such thing boldly, Ehitorujue suddenly noticed. That Hajime’s tone didn’t even sound pained at all and flowed smoothly. That his wounds from being tormented thoroughly had been mostly healed.



What was the reason that Hajime was healed? The reason was the same with how his strength was increased even after activating ‘Supreme Break’ already.



It finally melted, the capsule inside his stomach. The capsule filled with god water and cheatmate that Hajime had drunk beforehand.



Ehitorujue didn’t know about that, but he conjectured that it was impossible for such rapid healing to happen except by god water and he raised an angry voice.



“What you said about the god water being the last was also a lie-“



“It was a really delicious water that is worthy to be called god water you know?”



Hajime spoke indifferently. Toward such Hajime, Ehitorujue took distance without fussing over close quarter combat where he was about to launch space blasting and lightning divine spear. The humiliation of being fooled was oozing out from that expression.



As though to promote that displeasure further, Hajime constantly closed the distance smoothly not letting Ehito got away.



While the divine sword and Schlag were locked with each other, Ehitorujue asked from very close range.



“Why, only now.”



“Naturally, in order to obtain certainty. I’m not underestimating your strength.”



There was only one chance for the ‘godslaying’. Hajime didn’t understand what kind of strength Ehitorujue who had perfectly seized Yue’s body possessed, because of that it was necessary to make Ehito showed out his hands that Hajime hadn’t seen before in order to use that one chance with certainty. Ehitorujue intended to play around with Hajime, but Hajime was also doing the same thing albeit for a different reason.



The strength of Ehitorujue that surpassed the imagination was to the degree that made Hajime felt the scythe of the death god, but by paying compensation of pain and many of his artifacts, somehow Hajime was able to confirm the battle strength and hands that Ehitorujue possessed to a certain degree, also, he became able to grasp the ‘habit’ of Ehitorujue.



Ehitorujue regained his footing from the shock and his expression suddenly changed into looking amused. And then, he instantly invoked a large scale space blasting that didn’t even spare himself from being dragged into it.



The space creaked and the meteor shower that was sweeping over all around was popping off. Among them, Hajime whose expression distorted was also included inside. It seemed that he endured using ‘Vajra’ that had its output increased, but he bore a damage that didn’t look light. Hajime vomited out blood while coughing.



But, Hajime immediately rallied himself and detected Ehitorujue. Ehitorujue had returned once more to his throne where three layers of halos were behind his back. It seemed that he was injured by his own damage but he immediately recovered using ‘Automatic Regeneration’.



“Then, whether you are really not misunderstanding me or not, the might of this true god will ascertain that!”



Right after that, light exploded. The halos were releasing light so intense to the degree that would make anyone hallucinated that. And then, Each halo were beginning to rotate while shining brilliantly.



Even during that time, Hajime was approaching while slipping through the meteor shower that had been doubled in intensity, right after that, a very thick beam of light was fired from the halos. If anyone saw it, then they would think that it was just like the ‘Heaven Might’ that Kouki unleashed. Although, the power and scale of this one from Ehito were in a different league.



“This cannot be avoided you know, irregular! This light of ruin will continue to chase after you forever until you die!”



In contrast with Ehitorujue who was raising a loud voice, Hajime fiercely bared his fang and answered.



“Then, I’ll breakthrough frontally.”



A crimson flash with honed killing intent surged straight ahead.



At the same time, Hajime scattered all the grenades that he had, furthermore a huge assault lance coated with sealing stone was deployed in the front. A mechanical sound was reverberating from that assault lance, the lance was spreading like an umbrella while it was elongating by three stages and it began to rotate at high speed.



――Target dispersal assault lance ‘Lob Regenschirm’



A three-stage assault lance that rotated at high speed with its surface engraved by sealing stone and particular unevenness, that was to say it was a drill.



The target that was touched would be pulverized and dispersed as though being dug out. Hajime floated it in front of him, he used it as a shield while spreading intense ripples in midair, immediately after that, he charged toward the bombardment of ‘True Heaven Might’ along with a fierce impact.



While the coated sealing stone was being broken in the blink of eye, Lob Regenschirm was forcefully scattering the god’s might while leading its master Hajime toward the target’s position. Hajime also used ‘Vajra’, ‘Magic Power Emission’, and ‘Impact Conversion’ as explosive reactive armor and charged through the light of destruction!



“-uaaAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA-!!”



Blood spurted out from the wounds that just got healed due to the after-effect that couldn’t be dispersed, his internal organs, his flesh, his bones were screaming. The crimson aura he was clad with and another red were scattered around him, even so Hajime screamed without stopping his advance. He wouldn’t stand still even for an instant! Overwhelm back the overwhelming torrent! Crush the absurdity with even more absurdity! Just like how he came this far until now, tear apart all the obstacles-!



“You are breaking through even this-“



Ehitorujue saw Hajime who was advancing inside the Heaven Might he unleashed and got stabbed with that eye glint that was filled to the brim with tenacious determination and tremendous killing intent――and he prepared to run away once more.



He was going to withdraw from that spot using Heaven Existence. He was taking that action mostly subconsciously.



But, Hajime didn’t allow him to do such thing.



The whole area at the surrounding was enveloped by explosive sound. It was the grenades that Hajime scattered. The spaces at the center where the explosions happened were distorting like jelly, shockwaves were blowing violently due to the side effect of the spaces trying to return to normal.



The cause of this was the space explosion grenade that distorted the space and generated shockwave. Originally it was something that made use of space to attack the enemy using shockwave, but right now it was displaying a different effect.



That was the destabilization of space.



Whether the direct teleportation magic ‘Heaven Existence’ that didn’t use exact and delicate gate could be used in this place or not…



“――tsk. Another artifact again-“



It seemed Ehitorujue himself understood well the answer. At the very least it was something dangerous to the degree that made him spontaneously hesitating to activate the magic. And then, he was also unintentionally swearing from witnessing new artifacts appearing one after another.



Using that opportunity, Hajime finally broke through the True Heaven Might. The Lob Regenschirm was smashed up, Hajime himself was also worn out, but that terrifyingly sharply gleaming eyes pierced Ehitorujue that was right nearby.



Ehitorujue immediately changed plan from escaping to intercepting. He was already materializing divine sword in one hand and swung it with God Speed. The sword lines that were drawn within an instant easily surpassed a hundred. He was seriously serious. This was the full strength sword play of Ehitorujue.



It didn’t matter that his perception was shifted or whatever, that was irrelevant if he was just filling the space to the brim with sword slashes. Therefore, even Hajime appeared unable to react against that, without even any time to put a defense all the sword flashes passed through that body. There wasn’t even any resistance that could be felt from the sword cutting through flesh.



At the same time, the Hajime that should be cut dispersed lightly, from its shadow Hajime leaped out.



“Impossible-. Something that only has small effect of shifting perception is――”



“Just who said that such thing is the effect huh?”



Ehitorujue’s surprised voice was easily responded by Hajime. Illusion projection artifact ‘Novum Idola’ fundamentally only had the effect of derailing the perception. But, nobody was saying that was its whole ability or anything. Even if, that was the only ability it showed even when in a critical time.



The corner of Ehitorujue’s sight caught a bullet that was transparent like a crystal floating there.



――Illusion projection assistance artifact ‘Vision Bullet’



Combined with ‘Novum Idola’, an artifact that completely projected Hajime’s illusion was put in the core of this bullet. The moment Hajime broke through the True Heaven Might, he predicted that a severe interception attack would be waiting for him, so Hajime fired the Vision Bullet to the front while he himself drew back from Ehito’s sword range.



Ehitorujue who had just finished swinging his god sword, in addition to the shock, became slow in reacting, with an intense step Hajime threw away Schlag and he turned his artificial palm toward Ehito. Right after that, the gimmick in the palm worked and the five fingers there greatly elongated. Now it looked just like a skeleton hand of a giant.



Hajime struck with that expanding mechanical palm toward Ehitorujue. And then, in a flash the five fingers curled and restrained Ehitorujue’s body, then Hajime hurled himself forward which carried them through the halos immediately.



“aAAAAAAAAAAAAA-!!”



Hajime roared and then the gimmick of the artificial hand activated which let out many spikes that pierced Ehitorujue’s body like iron maiden, furthermore Hajime activated a space fixation that was limited to inside his palm and completely restrained Ehito.



Ehitorujue immediately attempted to use magic, but tremendous magic power radiation came out from the artificial hand that was glued close to his body――the magic power cannon ‘Glanzen’ loaded inside the artificial arm performed bombardment of pure magic power that stirred up the magic power inside Ehito’s body, due to that Ehito was unable to invoke magic instantly. Furthermore, Ehitorujue was able to swing his divine sword just by reversing his wrist, but that too was beyond his power due to the anchor and steel thread flying out from the artificial arm which bound his body and operated vibration pulverization.



“Raah!!”



“-!?”



Like that, at the end of dense offense and defense that happened for less than a second, Hajime succeeded in throwing down Ehitorujue on the ground.



The gazes of Ehitorujue who was held down on the ground and Hajime who was straddling him crossed each other. At the same time, along with a *kacha* sound, something hard was pushed on Ehitorujue’s heart from the opening of the five fingers.



It was the gun muzzle of Donner.



“This is check. The ‘godslaying’ that was born at the end of drowning in alcohol, taste it to your heart’s content.”



“Wa-――”



Instantly,



*DOPAN-*



A single gunshot.



Ehitorujue’s body twitched up.



What was fired was naturally the godlsaying bullet that picked only the god to destroy. The ‘Short Sword of Divine Crossing’ where the liberators’ tenacity resided was condensed, processed, and then remanufactured into a bullet.



Finally the trump card pierced through Ehitorujue.



Behind the halos were crumbling down as though they were weathering down into dust.



Silence filled the white space.



The closed eyelids of Yue quivered along with her long eyelashes. And then, on the eyes that slowly opened, the worn-out figure of Hajime was reflected…



“How unfortunate, irregular.”



“――”



Right after that, Hajime’s left arm was pulverized into very small pieces, and his body was spraying blood while getting blown away.





Chapter 176




All credit goes to the original author (Chuuni Suki), who has posted the raw data here:



Thanks for your continued support. If you like my writing style, check out my original works at , or just leave a comment.



Bakapervert translated this chapter. Bakapervert did the edits.



____________________________________



The Beloved Vampire Princess



A thunderous roar.



Scattering metal fragments.



Those fragments that rained down in pieces raised metallic sounds while falling on the ground, by that time a groaning voice resounded from a corner of the tiered stand where the throne was on. At the center of the crumbling chalk white stand that was crumbling down with clatters, there was the figure of Hajime buried from his back with his face distorted in pain.



That figure became bloodstained as though the healing by the god water previously was nonexistent, it didn't stop there, even his artificial left arm became gone and now he looked really tragic just from a glance.



"Guh, gahah"



While vomiting blood by a lot, Hajime tried to aim Donner to the front. The blood dripping down from his forehead entered his eye, dyeing his sight bright red as though the warning of red alert was turned on in his field of vision.



Inside that red field of vision, Ehitorujue who rose up lightly without feeling the gravity was making the gesture of snapping his fingers.



At that moment, a fierce impact hit the right hand holding Donner. Hajime mostly wasn't feeling pain because his sense of pain was paralyzed when he was blown away by the impact, but he understood what was being done to him. At the corner of his sight, the five fingers of his right hand were bending to the wrong direction because his partner that he should be holding was pulverized into pieces.



The fragments of the broken Donner fell on the ground, at the same time the 'Treasure Warehouse II' that Hajime fitted on the middle finger of his right hand was also rolling on the ground *roll roll* with a cute sound that felt out of place. It seemed that the artifact slipped off when his right hand was impacted.



"Splendid, it was splendid, irregular. For your trump card to strike this me, that is worthy of praise. Although, if a question of whether a trump card will always be worthy to be called as a trump card is asked, then the answer can only be no."



"…"



Ehitorujue walked closer with a composed and thin smile. Normally his footsteps wouldn't make any sound at all, but this time *step step* the footsteps echoed likely like the countdown to Hajime's death.



Furthermore, a step, each time Ehitorujue advanced by a step, the artificial arm and Donner, and then Schlag that fell on a slightly distant place were wrapped by platinum light. The artifacts of Hajime was shaking *shake shake* in resistance, but before long they became unable to endure and their shape broke down, at the end, they were completely annihilated not even leaving dust behind.



With the artifacts separated from the hand of their master Hajime, if they were continuously bathed in a focused light of destruction then even the countermeasure Hajime applied wouldn't hold.



"Are you wondering why? Certainly the bullet filled with the concept of 'godslaying' gouged my heart, yet why, I can be calm and composed like this. Ku-ku-ku-"



"…"



Ehitorujue watched Hajime with amusement, or perhaps with ridiculing while soaking in joy. Hajime didn't answer. Perhaps he didn't even have any leeway left to talk, Hajime only kept leaning on the broken stand limply with his eyes closed. Only his right eye with the eye patch covering it sliding off was slightly opened, but the magic eye stone wasn't created to obtain normal vision, so in reality Hajime was unable to see Ehitorujue's expression.



But, without even paying attention to such Hajime, Ehitorujue's tongue moved smoothly. The unsightly figure of Hajime whose plan to recover from the hopeless situation, to overturn the table with one attack had been crushed, was greatly pleasing for him.



"Indeed, if it was the me of the thousand years ago, perhaps I could possibly be destroyed by that. But, during all that time the secret technique to convert faith into strength to sublimate my soul has been continuing until now you know? Naturally, the status of my existence is also rising up. Something that is only like the concept created by a human at best means nothing against me. Furthermore, right now I have the body of this vampire princess. This flesh body itself becomes the protective wall that protects the soul taking root in it."



"…"



Hajime's artifacts that scattered at the surrounding were completely annihilated. All the artifacts were thoroughly annihilated with care, including the Schlagen AA and Cross Velts that had been crushed previously, the bullet cartridges, and even the fragments of the grenades.



Undoubtedly Ehitorujue was intending to cut off all the hope of Hajime with thoroughness. Although, Hajime already looked dead already with how he kept lying down without even any twitch but…perhaps this was only a simple entertainment for Ehitorujue without any regard to anything else.



"Although, even I didn't have the conviction that I will really end up safe from that, so I had no intention to get hit with it. Therefore, the attack just now made me a little uneasy. Truly that is a brilliant achievement, to do something like making a god feel uneasy. You can be proud, irregular."



"…"



*gyarit* Ehitorujue's foot trod on the 'Treasure Warehouse II' that was rolling on the floor. And then, he stepped down forcefully while purposefully making a sound. A beam of light leaked out from the stepped spot. As expected, the artifact was surely annihilated into nothing there.



With this, now the only artifact Hajime possessed was only his magic eye stone. It was unclear what was reflected in the eye of blue crystal peeking out from the faintly opened eyelid. Even though it couldn't show normal sight, naturally the eye artifact was able to distinguish the existence and the flow of magic power, so Hajime should be able to see how all his partners, the artifacts were annihilated.



However, even in front of that scene, where one of his important thing, and then one more important thing was hinted to be lost, Hajime's expression was still unmoving. The effect of the god water had gone, his left arm was lost, his right hand was broken, even his internal organs were beaten up so badly, lacerations were carved inside his body, and he couldn't even twitch his finger, it was unclear whether it was a dying figure or a figure that had given up on everything in despair.



At the very least, what Ehitorujue was seeing was that finally Hajime's heart had broken, that he had fallen into the abyss of despair. Like a demon whose meaning of existence was making people fall, his expression distorted into a chuckle.



And then, Ehitorujue who had walked before Hajime's eyes bent his knee in front of him, he matched his gaze to the same height with Hajime's and suddenly he swept his hand horizontally.



"――"



At that moment, a pebble of light star pierced Hajime's both legs. Hajime's femurs were pulverized. Wind holes were literally opened there.



One more of Hajime's power to resist was stolen, then Ehitorujue's slender and beautiful fingertip softly caressed Hajime's chin. And then, he lifted Hajime's head forcibly.



Toward Hajime whose left eye was opened slightly, Ehitorujue smiled composedly and brought his face closer to a kissing distance. And then, toyingly he changed the path of his lips just before it came into contact with Hajime and then he sweetly, repulsively, muddily, and stickily whispered into Hajime's ear while gluing close to him in half-embracing posture.



"I'll break everything important to you. Your comrades that stepped into Holy Precincts together with you, your compatriots that continue to resist on the surface, the family of your birthplace, I'll trample all of them underfoot, toy them, and let them raise agonizing cries."



"…"



Hajime didn't reply. He was merely staring, straight ahead at somewhere, there was no expression of emotion that could be seen from his body. He was really like an empty shell, as though his heart wasn't in his body anymore.



Ehitorujue stared at the side face of such Hajime with an expression of ecstasy.



"But, you can rest assured. I will treat only this amazing body of the vampire princess courteously. Because this is my important vessel, I'll handle it courteously, to every nook and cranny, to my heart's content, okay?"



His beloved woman was used by another as he pleased. Those words that were really hard to endure…made Hajime reacted. Suddenly his broken right hand moved, that hand reached searchingly toward Ehitorujue, no, toward Yue's chest.



"…Finally…I found you."



"Hm?"



A small, small whisper. Furthermore it sounded hoarse, that Ehitorujue who was right nearby missed it.



For Ehitorujue, Hajime was already an existence that solely existed to torment. A toy whose every hope had been crushed to nothing. There was no way he could do anything from here on, and so Ehito thought that small whisper was nothing more than Hajime's last lamentation, or possibly his pitiful cry that called on his beloved who didn't exist anymore.



Like that, intending to taste the nectar that was the last despair of human, Ehito brought his ear closer to Hajime's lips.



Hajime slowly opened his mouth. That was originally a chant that he didn't need to recite anymore. Be that as it may, it was Hajime's greatest weapon that was his lifeline until now, the word that showed his only talent.



"'Transmute'."



Instantly, Ehitorujue was about to say "what are you" with a scrutinizing suspicious look, but he was unable to do that.



The reason was,



"――Gaah, gahah!?"



Suddenly, countless blade flew out from Ehitorujue's chest.



Metal blades grew out like a mountain of blade soaked in blood, biting and tearing flesh from inside. That happened not only in Ehito's chest, but within an instant everywhere on Ehito's body there were blades flying out, furthermore the metals that were adjoining each other would be glued together using metal fragments from that came from somewhere unknown as an intermediary, restraining Ehitorujue's body gruesomely.



The strange phenomenon of blades flying out from inside the body caused Ehitorujue's thought to halt completely for a moment. That was just how shocking this surprise attack was combined with the conviction in his victory.



The blades piercing the body and the sparking crimson metal fragments which came from somewhere were physically obstructing Ehitorujue's movement together, the sealing stone component that seemed to be included in the metal hindered him from using magic, furthermore the very strangeness itself was halting his thought. The opening that was made from those lasted only for a few seconds.



But, that opening was invaluable. This moment was exactly the timing that Hajime had waited eagerly for, the true critical moment that he was aiming for.



"'Transmute-'!"



Once more Hajime yelled his own talent.



This magic was merely processing metal, that was all it could do. Right now, at a glance the metal that existed in this place was only the blades that flew out from Ehitorujue's body, no matter how there was no way this magic could work on an opponent who overcame even the 'godslaying'.



However, the broken right arm of Hajime――using direct operation of magic power he forcefully moved that broken hand to touch a spot…his own abdomen.



Immediately, crimson spark surged and at the same time blood soaked blade flew out from Hajime's stomach.



"――!?"



Ehitorujue gazed in astonishment. His astonishment didn't come from the fact that Hajime was hiding metal lump inside his stomach, or because that lump was now piercing open his own stomach.



He was astonished because he sensed the abnormal presence filling the flying out blade. His spine was having goosebumps, his instinct was ringing the alarm bell noisily. This presence was undoubtedly the same presence like what he felt previously――a presence of concept magic.



In a world of instantaneous moment, Ehitorujue immediately tried to use Heaven Existence. However, the clusters of micro blades stirring up inside his body(blood vessel) obstructed his thinking and magic usage, even his automatic regeneration was slowed down. In addition, the metal shackle that had sewed through both his legs before he noticed prevented him from physically jumping away.



That opening which was exposed for less than a second was enough for Hajime's blade to reach. It was hard to understand because of all the blood, but the small knife that looked like toy contained god crystal, its transparent blade was clad in a deep crimson light which was thrust toward Ehito…and then, accurately the knife plunged into Ehitorujue's body.



Instantly the deep crimson magic power swelled up. At the center was Ehitorujue's body. At the same time Ehitorujue's scream resounded.



"GAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA!!?"



A scream of uneasiness and agony that was impossible to come from merely getting stabbed by a small knife resounded. The blades that came out from inside his body were annihilated by platinum light and the restrain was undid, Ehitorujue then stepped back in staggers while holding his head and his body writhing in agony.



Ehitorujue's body began to *dokun, dokun!* pulsate.



That was the beacon of the awakening. The yell of determination that original owner of the writhing body was raising.



"Impossible-, the vampire princess should have been annihilated completely!"



Indeed, Ehitorujue had felt the soul vanishing in annihilation. Ehitorujue's face warped from the torrent of power welling up inside his body trying to push him out while he yelled the question that expressed his bewilderment.



The one who answered that was Hajime. While his body was unable to even wake up, his mouth was showing a fierce smile.



"Yue was a cut above you, that's all there is to it isn't that right?"



"――"



Ehitorujue guessed from those words. That was to say, Yue's annihilation was actually a feign that she intentionally showed to him. She feigned using up all of her strength before vanishing, and then she concealed her own soul and lurked at the deepest depth of the body.



She believed that in time help would surely come.



By any chance the scream that Ehitorujue heard might also be Yue's acting performance.



"But, but-, why-!?"



Ehitorujue writhed, and finally he fell on his knee while holding his head before unconsciously whispering his indescribable question.



To that, Hajime pushed out his hand and he answered while running spark on his hand.



"The bullet of 'godslaying' shook your soul and awoke Yue's soul. The 'Blade of Blood Pledge' severed your invading thought and granted strength to Yue."



"What do you――, don't tell me-"



Ehitorujue almost leaked out words of bewilderment for a moment there because he didn't understand what Hajime meant, but he immediately made a shocked expression in understanding.



Hajime who saw that lifted the corner of his mouth further.



Concept magic 'Godslaying'――that was a magic that exterminated only the soul with divinity without giving any influence at Yue's body. However, Hajime followed the warning of Miledy who gifted him with that power and didn't rely on it.



Therefore, he used it only for its special characteristic with the objective of supplementing his true trump card. That was to say the godslaying bullet gave a not small effect to Ehitorujue's soul even though it didn't become a lethal damage, which created an opening and woke Yue up, and then it also further gave the opening for Yue herself to wield her strength.



And then, Hajime's second blade(the true trump card) separated Ehitorujue and Yue's soul with certainty. Hajime was faintly opening the magic eye in his right eye was in order to ascertain that. The words "I found you" that he whispered faintly was because he had caught sight of Yue's soul that lurked in the deepest part of the body.



Artifact Blade of Blood Pledge(Blood Fea Rezvie)――that artifact which Hajime hid inside his stomach in round ore shape was enchanted with the concept of [Thy art forbidden to touch(Don't touch my woman)]. That was to say, this concept magic forbade interference to Yue's soul and severed the intervention that was already there.



The weakness of this magic was the point where it couldn't display its true worth if it didn't directly hit Yue's soul, because of that Hajime had to make the 'godslaying' hit with certainty no matter what, and so he had to go through that much hardships to reach this point…



Anyway, with this Yue's soul that was completely cut loose from Ehitorujue's influence was now in a state that was protected by a barrier, and so she could wield her power completely. Furthermore, this Blade of Blood Pledge(Blood Fea Rezvie) was intentionally made to have a hollow blade, using capillary phenomenon the blade was filled with a lot of Hajime's blood.



Yue's skill――the 'Blood Pledge Contract' drastically amplified the effect of blood sucking only from the sole partner that she designated. Using that skill, Hajime directly poured his blood through Blade of Blood Pledge(Blood Fea Rezvie) and strengthened Yue's soul.



"You are saying, you are aiming for this-, right from the start!?"



"If I can overcome you using overwhelming resources, then that's great. But, what is at stake here is the life of my beloved. Isn't it obvious that I'm going to prepare two or three tricks for this?"



The power of Yue's soul was increasing in force second by second. It raged to chase away the foreign contamination from inside herself. This is my body, the only one who can touch it is just Hajime, the soul screamed. The platinum magic power that whirled violently flickered and the color of the radiance was changing to golden, that light was pulsating as though to display its determination and hit Ehitorujue's soul hard.



Ehitorujue was hallucinating. A pair of eyes slowly opened, and those crimson eyes of the beautiful figure of the vampire princess pierced him. the immense trust toward her beloved partner was dwelling in those eyes, that look eloquently told of how she had been waiting for this moment.



That meant that both Yue and also Hajime had the same feeling. Without using any will communication skill or artifact, they mutually understood what each other would do.



Ehitorujue thought. At that time, although he succeeded in hijacking Yue's body but he overlooked Hajime and let him gotten away after receiving resistance from Yue. He wondered if since that time by any chance he was dancing above the palm that was the bond of these two.



A tremendous humiliation and indescribable displeasure jarred Ehitorujue's mind. Ehitorujue then yelled with that raging heart.



"Don't underestimate me-, vampire princess-. This body is mine! I won't let any seed of anxiety in the future get left behind! I'll pinch and crush your soul for sure this time-. Then next it will be you-, irregular! Hahah, in front of my power a concept of just this level will――"



In actuality, even after being stabbed with Blade of Blood Pledge, the conflict between Ehitorujue and Yue's soul for the leadership of the body was in a stalemate. That was just how immense the soul of god that had been sublimated using the secret technique of faith conversion.



But,



"I thought you'd say that."



Ehitorujue's words were cut off by a single sentence, by a light tone as though everything was already within expectation.



"――Wha, t?"



Ehitorujue's eyes snapped wide open. That wasn't because his words were cut off.



It was because ahead of his gaze, there was the figure of Hajime still leaning on the tiered platform with his trembling right hand aimed at Ehitorujue.



And then, what was hard to believe for him, what he didn't want to believe, was that from the bullet clutched by that hand――there was a presence of a new concept magic that was emitted out.



Just from where in the world Hajime took out that bullet from? Looking from how the bullet was soaked in blood, perhaps it was hidden inside his body as expected.



"So, something like that, after this late! You don't even have artifact!"



Ehitorujue couldn't move his body from his struggle against Yue's soul, but even with unease oozing out on his expression he still yelled mockingly.



Indeed, even if Hajime possessed a bullet but without Donner or Schlag then he wouldn't be able to shot it. Hajime's legs were drilled through, looking from how those wounds were still not healed yet, he also shouldn’t be able to directly strike it to Ehito.



But, Hajme was only too aware of such thing.



Hajime, for the third time, chanted his greatest magic.



"'Transmute'."



Vivid crimson spread. It was spreading to the surrounding space and gradually the color was changing to thick deep crimson. At the same time, the held out bullet was glittering brightly in the hand clutching it and wind gathered. It was gradually forming a shape of something small.



"…Metal, particle?"



Ehitorujue whispered dumbfoundedly. That whisper was entirely spot on.



"I order to take back Yue with certainty, I estimated that at the very least three stages of a process are necessary. …I told you already. That I swore I'll certainly take her back."



"Don't tell me, in the middle of that fight…then, you also aimed for this since the start…"



Why, in the middle of an instantaneous battle that he was forced to do, Hajime frequently used weapons with time lag like grenades and the like until he used them all up? Why, did the Grim Reapers and Cross Velts would explode everywhere even when they got hit by slashing attack? Just what was the metal that flew out from Ehitorujue's body?



The answer was this――the metal particle.



The metal particles that were unseen by eyes and floated in the air made by disintegrating metal very finely were filled into all the grenades, Cross Velts, and the Grim Reapers. And then they were exploded and scattered everywhere through the whole area. Among the grenades there were also those that were filled with nothing but metal particles, among the eagle model Grim Reapers there were also individuals that were only scattering particles all the time.



In the middle of that battle, when Hajime judged that he couldn't overcome Ehito in a battle of resource, he made a Cross Velt to be shot down above Ehitorujue's head which caused metal particles to be scattered, Ehitorujue sucked in the particles and after Hajime confirmed that he didn't notice that, Hajime moved on to the second stage of the plan.



That plan was to give Ehito the impression that he was fighting desperately just to make his only trump card the 'godslaying' hit Ehito, but in fact he was sprinkling the metal particles that would become his transmutation material to the surrounding, for the sake of attacking and restraining Ehitorujue from inside his body. That was the second stage of the plan.



And then, the reason that the transmutation which should be unusable without touching the target could now transmute by gathering metal from wide range was because of the final derivative skill of transmutation, 'Convergence Transmutation'. This was one of the two things that Hajime obtained at the same time when he obtained the innermost secret of transmutation, the 'Imagination Composition' that Hajime was awakened to at that devil king castle.



The effect of this skill was simple. It would gather the metal at the surrounding and the user could transmute without touching it, that was all. It had a plainness that was fitting for a common job.



But, what would happen if it was used with the metal that was taken inside the body? Ehitorujue's lung and stomach that had absorbed a lot of the metal floating in the air were surely smeared with metal particles inside.



And then, that restraining using the artificial arm. Even the spikes that flew out from the artificial hand and stabbed Ehitorujue to bind him in place dissolved metal particles and poured it into his body. If those metal particles flowed into the bloodstream and then turned into splinters, it was self-evident that Ehitorujue would be hacked into pieces from inside.



"I got overwhelmed in the battle of resource. You showed me the gap between us at close quarter combat. I used all my trump cards, and went further than that. All of my hands(artifacts) were crushed. That was why…"



――you thought you had win right?



Hajime's mouth that split like a crescent moon diabolically and his words, proofed that Ehitorujue's conjecture was correct. Exactly because he was convinced of his victory, exactly because he had endured the trump card and became convinced that there was an overwhelming gap between him and Hajime, that Ehitorujue glued close to Hajime's body so defenselessly like that. He was convinced of victory and showed an opening.



Having that opening which was actually Hajime's true aim taken advantage of, and then taught that Hajime had been laying down preparations all the time in the middle of that breathtaking battle, and furthermore witnessing Hajime's mercilessness of hacking to pieces his body from the inside even though it was the body of his lover regardless of the possession, all of those factors greatly shaken Ehitorujue's mind with agitation. And what made it unbearable for Ehito was that agitation was then taken advantage of by the vampire princess.



While Ehitorujue was agitated and his mind split to handle Yue's attack, finally the converged metal particles took shape and became a tiny gun of a single shot. It had really small and simple make that couldn't be compared at all with Donner or Schlag.



Nevertheless, the bullet that was loaded into it was a lethal fang.



Hajime's fingers that should be broken were forcefully moved using magic power operation and fixed on the trigger.



Ehitorujue was roaring while annihilating the blades flying out from his body and the metal shackle coiling around his body, while also trying to move his body, possibly he was trying to teleport away. But, immediately the pulsation became a level fiercer and obstructed all of his efforts. Even the automatic regeneration's activation was stopped completely.



It was as though the pulsation was covering for Hajime's attack.



Surely, that wasn't just the imagination.



The blood soaked Hajime, with a fearless grin even now made the gun that looked like a small derringer pistol sparked with deep crimson electricity.



And then,



"I'm having her back. That woman, every single drop of her blood, every single strand of her hair, and even every single piece of her soul, everything is mine."



The crimson flash pierced Ehitorujue who was screaming with a desperate face.



What was fired was the artifact Bullet of Blood Pledge(Blood Fea Bullet). The concept filled in it was [The Knitted Bond Into This Hand(I'm No Good Without You)]――this concept magic made the souls of Yue and Hajime that seek each other to resonance, it explosively strengthened Yue's soul, at the same time it would forcefully tear off the joining of the foreign substance(soul) rooting inside the body, while at the same time granting horrific agony toward the intruder that felt like the nerves getting directly broiled.



"――!!"



A soundless scream. It was unclear whether in the end it was the scream that Ehitorujue raised, or else the loud scream of fighting spirit that Yue raised.



Right after that, a golden light exploded.



That color was far warmer and more vivid than the platinum radiance of before. It illuminated as though enveloping Hajime, making him feeling hopelessly heartrending. It was the light of his beloved without a doubt.



Right after that, two eyes opened as though awakening from the sleep. The striking rubies caught her beloved straight ahead.



And then, like a flower bud that was blooming proudly in its full glory, or possibly like the sun that showed its face by driving away the dark cloud, she displayed a bewitching smile that emitted glorious radiance.



Yue's body floated gently.



She was blood-soaked, but such thing did nothing except promoting her glamor instead. With her figure that gave and adult charm, her abundant golden threads fluttering softly, both her hands spread wide open as though in welcome, or possibly it was her desire to welcome, she leaped forward, such figure, just what kind of words in the world that could possibly be used to express it?



Like a goddess――such words felt so hopelessly clichéd for this.



Hajime was merely, with an earnestly affectionate expression, he gently narrowed his eyes while his hand reached slowly in order to grant the wish of his lover.



Yue leaped to there. She dropped her waist above Hajime softly just like silk floss, without letting him felt anything like weight, without stopping her face rubbed on his chest. Her arms that circled around him tiiiiiiightly constrained Hajime, wordlessly, as though she was pleading for the two of them to melt together into one.



Hajime too circled his arm around Yue and embraced her tightly. Thing like the pain at his arm or stomach, was so small like a hair strand compared to the pain of his heart when he was separated from her.



Before long, Yue lifted her face that was buried on his chest. Those eyes were moist in a display of the emotion filling inside her, the breath leaking out from that lovely pink lips was so hot that it felt scalding.



Hajime softly put his hand on the cheek of Yue that was dyed in rose color, while he gifted her with words overflowing with affectionate tone.



"I came to pick you up, my vampire princess."



"…Nn, I have faith. My demon king-sama."



Hearing the joking names they called each other with, both of them let out a chuckle smilingly.



The kiss happened naturally. Their lips were merely touching each other, yet it was a gentle kiss that carried their whole feeling. The taste of blood was entertaining. Yue's small tongue swiped out and licked the clotted blood pasted on Hajime's lips.



But, at that time, as though trying to tear apart once again the two who were gluing at each other, a tremendous killing intent along with an immense torrent of light assaulted them.



Immediately, Yue turned behind with only her upper body while pushing out her hand. Instantly a barrier of light was deployed.



There, a shockwave that creaked the space along with a bombardment of light crashed.



"…Nn-"



Yue slightly leaked out her voice. Her eyebrows frowned mightily.



Yue herself was also quite spent after chasing out Ehitorujue's soul, but this bombardment was filled with a force even more than that that made Yue's barrier creaked along with the space.



She didn't have any spare strength to use age of god magic. While Haijme was wounded all over his body and couldn't move.



Therefore they were determined. With that will, Yue continued to hold up the 'Holy Severance', and Hajime leaned close to her. There, words that sounded like curse filled with madness were resounding.



{Kill-, kill-, kill-, I'm going to kill you-, irregularrrr!}



At the other side of the barrier, at the origin of the light bombardment. Over there, a human form made from light itself was floating. At the spot that seemed to be the head of that floating light human form, the mouth was irregularly distorted in an expression of rage.



Even thought that figure was blurred, but they understood well who it was. Even though the voice was different, even with rage coloring the look, that oozing out vulgarity couldn't possibly be mistaken.



That lump of light was undoubtedly Ehitorujue.





Chapter 177




Arifureta Shokugyou de Sekai Saikyou (The World’s Strongest By Common Job)



*creak, crack* The barrier that Yue deployed was cracking.



The bombardment of light was unceasingly increasing in power in order to annihilate anything and everything.



{This place is Holy Precincts. Despite my body is being only a soul right now, just overwhelming the exhausted you two is not a difficult matter-! I’ll blast away irregular before the eyes of the vampire princess, and then, I’ll plunder that body once more!}



Ehitorujue’s voice echoed through the whole space.



Seeing how Ehitorujue didn’t use both penetrating attacks like the divine sword or divine flame, or space crossing attack like lightning divine spear that used Heaven Existence, the damage from the conflict against Yue’s soul and Bullet of Blood Pledge seemed to make Ehitorujue considerably exhausted.



But, even so the light bombardment was still tremendous. That was surely the original magic power light of Ehitorujue. From a glance, the light was radiant in a display of its divinity. But, it continued endlessly just like a bombardment, loud laughter that contained rage and madness were making the divine aura of the light to end in vain.



{Come, stop your useless resistance and repent. Now that your last hope has been severed, there is already no meaning in anything that you do!}



The light swelled up. The cracks on ‘Holy Severance’ were gradually getting larger.



It seemed that Ehitorujue’s pride was greatly wounded from being done in by Hajime and Yue, to the degree that he didn’t give careful consideration for Yue’s body state with his attack. He was surely thinking that he could just use ‘Automatic Regeneration’ after he repossessed the body. Rather than that, he put more importance in creating a spectacle where Hajime got erased away in front of Yue’s eyes without her being unable to do anything.



It appeared that Ehitorujue was convinced that such tragic future would come true. Hajime who was wounded all over with his two trump cards, the concept magic used up couldn’t possibly have any reserve power anymore, he thought. Even the liberators where they had seven members before could only create three concept magic.



Hajime creating two concept magic could even be said as a miracle due to the strength of his feeling toward Yue.



For that reason,



“It’s the end with this, just who was saying that’s the case huh?”



{Still bluffi――}



Ehitorujue’s words stopped midway.



That was because behind the barrier, he saw the figure of Hajime floating a diabolical smile, his lips splitting widely like a crescent moon. Even though Ehitorujue didn’t have a flesh body, yet that expression made a chill to rush through his body.



“Yue.”



“…Nn. Leave it to me.”



The two were on the same page. Even without knowing at all regarding the detail about the card that Hajime had, Yue clearly understood what it was that Hajime wanted just like the back of her own hand. That was why, excessive word was unnecessary. With the resoluteness that this would be the last, Yue roared her magic power and poured strength into ‘Holy Severance’.



Metal particles converged on Hajime’s hand. What he was transmuting was a single bullet. There was nothing special in it at all, it was just a mere bullet.



However, there Hajime gritted his teeth audibly. And then with a ‘puih’ he spat out something, the last concept magic that he crammed and hid in one of his teeth――Reject All Existences(Anything and Everything, Just Disappear)



That concept magic which was thought to be lost together with the breaking down of the chain where it was enchanted in, Hajime somehow managed to use Convergence Transmutation to secure some of it even though he could only gather about the amount of his pinky finger, he then processed it and put it at the back of his teeth beforehand. It was for the sake of this time.



Hajime himself was surprised that the concept still remained when he gathered it even after the chain turned into very small pieces, but surely that showed just how extreme the emotion of emptiness that he felt when Yue was taken away. It was a terrifyingly deep emotion.



To the very end, the Blade of Blood Pledge and the Bullet of Blood Pledge were for the sake of rescuing Yue. Therefore, since the start, the finishing blow was intended to be carried out by this bullet of concept, filled with the pure wish of destruction. The tooth was small, but nevertheless it was emitting a definite presence, using transmutation the bullet was then got coating by it.



{That’s-}



“The reason Aruvheit died wasn’t because he was a god. He was merely got dragged into my rampage when I snapped because you all laid your hand on Yue, that’s all. Something like the concept of godslaying, there is no way I can create something like that don’t you think?”



{You, you basta――}



Hajime corrected the misunderstanding that Ehitorujue had.



That whether it was Ehitorujue, or whether it was Aruvheit, Hajime didn’t oppose them because they were ‘god’ that acted tyrannically in this world.



They incurred the wrath of Nagumo Hajime.



That was all there was to it, the reason that Ehitorujue and his conspirators got ruined.



Being informed that implicitly, Ehitorujue lost his words. Because he noticed, that for Hajime, there was not that much difference between him the god and the random monster that attacked Hajime.



Regardless of the overwhelming gap in power between them, but Hajime’s attitude against Ehitorujue was exactly the same like how he treated all the opponents that came to crush him until now. That was, ‘you are the enemy so I’ll kill you’. Truly there was nothing special or anything in how Hajime acted against this god.



{Do, don’t screw, you bastard-}



Ehitorujue talked with babbling words. The humiliation he felt was too great, and not only that, the concept that was now aimed at him was too atrocious, the black purpose that wanted to destroy Hajime right now without delay and his instinct that wanted to run away right now were struggling inside him.



That hesitation became fatal for him.



“This is checkmate, small fry.”



With fearlessly crooked lips, Hajime loaded the bullet he held in his mouth into the derringer pistol, and then he pulled the trigger without hesitation along with some sharp words. The loaded Existence Rejection bullet became a crimson flash that was fired. Yue made the barrier to be able to be passed through with a superb timing, regardless of the bombardment of light, the attack of destruction was annihilating what it touched from the outset.



Although it was too late, Ehitorujue chose the option to evade which displayed his unease but…



“I command under the name of Yue-, ‘Don’t move’!”



{Ridiculous-}



After having her body taken over, Yue felt the flow of power inside the body many times over, she watched and listened to its result. For the genius of magic that was counted as a part of the strongest people in a war-torn era when she was merely a ten years old, there was no reason that she would be unable to do that.



Her magic power had already reached the very bottom. But, so what, she scolded her mind that was blacking out with her strength of will, she forcefully twisted her body that was pleading to her that it was the limit and squeezed out magic power, she also circulated the magic power that she was consuming for ‘Holy Severance’ and activated the magic――Divine Statement.



Surely Ehitorujue never thought that his own magic would be used back on him even in his wildest dream. Compared to the Divine Statement that Ehitorujue used, what Yue used was somewhat of a shoddy quality, however, it still splendidly restrained the target.



{I am-, I am the god!! Irregulaaaaaar!!!}



A shriek.



The crimson flash of ruin approached. Even though there was no face, but it was clear to see. Ehitorujue right now was showing an expression of terror. The impossible scene, the unbelievable reality, the sound of his path that he believed, without a doubt, would continue for eternity was crumbling fragilely resounded.



However, no matter how much he was denying reality, no matter how godly he was, even though he yelled how absolute he was…emotionlessly, heartlessly, irrationally, the murderous roar that the monster raised destroyed anything and everything in this world.



That was the reality.



Therefore,



{――—!!!!!!}



The crimson flash pierced through the torrent of light, erased the shriek, smashed the gruesome future――and penetrated the mad god’s chests.



Soundlessly, the crimson flash disappeared toward the faraway white space.



The torrent of light dispersed, Ehitorujue trailed his hand on the hole gaping wide open in his chest. And then, he raised a wordless scream while his hands moved as though tearing off his chest, or possibly desperately attempting to plug off the hole, exposing a state that even made anyone felt pity to him.



{aaAA, ridiculous…such thing…impossible}



Although he leaked out words that denied the reality, his body of light was still crumbling with the hole on his chest as the center of the breaking down.



And then, at the end, with one more whisper of “…impossible”, the light humanoid form that was Ehitorujue melted into empty air and vanished.



The radiance of ‘Holy Severance’ melted into the empty air at the same time before Yue limply fell down and sat on the ground femininely.



Hajime slowly lowered down the small gun.



Silence wrapped the area.



Other than the slightly rough breathing of Hajime and Yue, there was no sound at all.



Yue earnestly lifted up her eyelids that were trying to close even now while slowly looking back over her shoulder with a smile.



Toward that, Hajime too returned a smile…it was at that moment,



“Yue-!”



“――”



Hajime’s impatient voice resounded in warning.



To that Yue held her breath, at the same time a weird shrike that sounded unthinkable to come from this world resounded.



――aaaAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA!!!!



At the same time, an invisible violent impact became a storm that attacked the two.



Unable to even resist Yue was sent flying, sending her on Hajime’s chest with her back to him. Haijme immediately circled his hand around Yue and twisted his body, covering her from the shockwave with his own body.



Thunderous sound.



That was the sound of the tiered gallery Hajime was half buried into getting pulverized into small pieces. It was lucky that he wasn’t pressed by the impact onto the chalk white wall, but it didn’t change that the abnormal shockwave was showering on him.



Hajime kept covering Yue in his embrace while he got blown away like a leaf toyed by a storm along with the wreckages of the tiered gallery, he then got bounced on the ground many times before he finally stopped.



“Guh, gahah, Yue-…”



“…Nnh, Ha, jime…”



Hajime called to Yue while vomiting blood everywhere. Yue only got a little damage because Hajime covered for her, but even so she seemed to be injured to the degree that she was unable to properly move.



Both of them linked their hand together and somehow stood up by supporting each other. And then, they observed the surrounding while sweating coldly.



“Oi oi, what the hell is that…”



“Haa haa…looks like…the Holy Precincts itself, get affected.”



Exactly as Yue said, here and there cracks entered the white space, there were also spots that looked twisted like jelly, showing that the space was clearly getting unstable. At the distorted spots, sights of unknown worlds, familiar worlds, and the scene of the surface were projected and disappeared, the sceneries were repeatedly projected and vanished.



And then, the source of the weird shriek and tremendous shockwave was…



“…Actually, the last boss, still has two transformations left…is this something like that? Well, in a sense, this is a normal template though.”



“…Nn. He is, already, just a monster…”



At the place where Hajime and Yue’s gaze were directed, clad in muddy black miasma that was being spouted out from the distorted space, or possibly it was absorbing the miasma, even now the thing that was Ehitorujue was raising a strange shrieking voice.



{uuu, AA, aa–――}



As though getting attracted by that extremely unpleasant groan which rubbed the mind of the listener the wrong way, miasma was gathering endlessly from the distorted space at the surrounding, from inside the miasma they could perceive figures that seemed to be monster or apostle. But, all those figures were being sucked into Ehitorujue without showing any resistance at all while staring blankly into empty air.



And then, there was more unpleasant sound resounding. *beki-, gokyu, gucha, boki-* Just like the sound of bone and bone grinding at each other, or like flesh and flesh crushing each other, graphic sounds were echoing from inside the miasma.



At the same time, intermittent words were spreading with echoes.



――Don’t want…to die-, don’t want, to…di…e



――Why…eno, ugh…you, said…I don’t, understand…don’t, want…to, die-



――Etern, nal……ly…everything…



――Go, d…I, be…come…god, already…ye, t…why…



――Mis…taken, no…..such, thing, I, am the…



――O, bey…everything…..break…sma, sh…



――Cho…ke, ye…ll…lament…gri, ef…



――Don’t, want…don’t, wanna…di, e-



Those words were an obsession to life, a deep resentment toward others, a childish self-righteousness, a vulgar self-conceit, merely an inexcusable outburst of anger.



But, whether it was the feeling of not wanting to die, or even the feeling of wanting to become alone and destroy anything and everything…it was something that he really didn’t want to acknowledge that he felt disgusted from the bottom of his heart but, Hajime could understand those feelings completely.



His heart changed at the bottom of the abyss thinking that other people were worthless, he pawed on the ground to survive even by slurping blood and flesh. When Yue was stolen, he rampaged wildly and even created a concept that brought about extreme destruction from his empty feeling.



“…That is, by some chance, if I…wasn’t able to meet Yue and others…that――”



Might be me. The lips of Hajime that were going to murmur that were blocked by the slender index finger of Yue.



And then, she silently shook her head and gently denied it with a whispering voice.



“…Hajime is different from that. …Even that thing, surely had people who thought of him, someone that he ought to reach out to, and also someone that reached out to him. The result of not looking back on those, is that.”



Yue’s crimson eyes gently squinted.



“…The path, Hajime has walked until now. That is Hajime’s everything.”



Even when his heart changed, the scream that was raised at the bottom of the abyss reached him. Even while saying that the matter of this world was inconsequential, in the end, he saved a lot of people. The path that he had walked like that stopped Hajime’s rampage.



That was why, even though the two might look similar, but the two of them were completely different.



That was why, Yue said, don’t look down on my Hajime.



She told that. Conveyed that to him.



“…If that’s what Yue said, then that must be so.”



“…Nn-“



Hajime made a wry smile from basking in sentimentality in the middle of this absolute great crisis of all place, and also from being scolded at this very late hour. Toward such Hajime, Yue also smiled gently.



Even while they were doing that, the thing that was Ehitorujue continued to spout out his selfish emotion that was unbearable to listen on, on the contrary, its soul was absorbing the miasma and the ruins of monsters and apostles with terrific momentum.



Ehitorujue was obviously losing sanity. Thinking from how the space was getting unstable, the cause wasn’t only because of the previous shockwave, obviously the cause was from Ehitorujue’s abnormality. In other words, that meant that the bullet of Existence Denial had certainly granted a lethal damage to Ehitorujue.



Even so he didn’t vanish, in his rejection he took in the miasma and the monsters into himself to compensate for his vanishing existence, this was surely Ehitorujue’s earnest desire of survival and the strength of his obsession for control.



Ehitorujue that could vanish anytime was holding out only with his tenacity, however, Hajime and Yue didn’t have any way to give him the finishing blow.



Their magic power had dried up, they were wounded all over and unable to even stand up properly.



The trump cards that Hajime prepared had been all used up. Hajime could do nothing but smiling bitterly toward that fact. Truly, this world’s difficulty level was a bit too hard to be expressed with the word of fantasy which was packed with dream and hope.



But, at that time, the miasma that was covering the area around Ehitorujue ruptured and blew off.



The thing that was Ehitorujue was still enveloped in whirling black mist, but now his full figure could be seen clearly.



“That is seriously a monster huh.”



“…Nn. Rather that looks pitiful.”



The impression of the two was frank.



What was there was a lump of meat. Flesh, bone, and skin of several races were haphazardly combined with limbs jutting out from the wriggling meat lump. Several tentacles were undulating, looking extremely grotesque. That figure would make people lost their sanity and felt like vomiting just by its appearance.



The thing that was Ehitorujue which was reduced into that meat lump suddenly shrieked.



――GiiaaaAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA-!!!!



A storm immediately blew violently. Black miasma whirled, invisible shockwaves that centered on the meat lump blew away the chalk white ground.



The shockwave was emitted radially without any direction, even so it hid a force to the degree that even Hajime and Yue who were already thrown to considerable distance were blown away even further.



Hajime and Yue were blown away while leaking out agonized voice, even then their linked hands didn’t let go no matter what while they struck the ground. Hajime shrugged in exasperation even while his expression distorted from pain and he gave instruction to Yue.



“Yue, suck my blood.”



“…-, but”



“It’s fine.”



Hajime’s words made Yue hesitated. Hajime said that it was fine, but there was no way that was true. He was already bleeding to the degree until one of his feet was already inside the grave, or possibly it had already surpassed even that. The wound on his stomach and also the wounds on both his legs weren’t treated yet or anything. Hajime had tightened his muscles and held back his bleeding, but he was in a state that it wouldn’t be strange for his heart to stop anytime from bleeding too much.



He was holding on to his consciousness, and even now he was wracking his mind in order to survive, to kill his enemy, he was able to do those thanks to his tough body that could be earnestly titled as a monster. Even so his condition was really on the brink. If here Yue sucked his blood, that might really become the finishing blow for him.



At far away, Ehitorujue was raising a roar that shaved on sanity once more. The space fiercely distorted each time with the shockwave destroying the chalk white world. Furthermore, the undulating tentacles could also be seen wandering searching for prey. At this rate, it was clear they would die without doing anything. Even so, Yue was still hesitating, to that Hajime showed her a smile.



That smile, was the bold and fearless smile that always made Yue’s chest to tighten. His canine was bared, his eyes gleamed fiercely, the ally gave immense trust to that smile, and the enemy was granted with a traumatic shudder by that smile, the smile of the demon that made the vampire princess as its slave.



“Didn’t I tell you? This is the template. Do you think, that I didn’t foresee this kind of situation?”



“Hajime…”



“Indeed, all my trump cards are used up. However, there is still the prepared finished product, see?”



Yue already didn’t have any word. Aa, truly, this person that I loved…was really diabolical. Such feeling throbbed loudly in her chest, Yue leaked out a feverish breath and she nodded briskly.



And then, while she felt the sensation of Hajime’s arm that was embracing her tightly, she put her teeth on his neck. The flowing in blood recovered Yue’s magic power for just slightly――no, at the next moment, a terrific pulsation came. *dokun dokun*, a really slight amount of blood that normally wouldn’t do anything for her was now restoring Yue with a momentum that was far surpassing the effect of ‘Blood Pledge Contract’ or anything else.



The reason for that was one.



――Yue exclusive artifact Nagumo Hajime



Blood that had the effects to sublimate Yue’s ‘Blood Pledge Contract’ by several levels, to make the skill ‘Limit Break’ be possible, and then with the iron content of the blood abundantly bestowed with the ingredient of cheatmate, such blood liquid was flowing inside Hajime’s body.



By assuming a situation where he lost all his artifacts, where the taken back Yue was in exhaustion, and in addition the Bullet of Denial Existence was unable to kill the opponent, Hajime prepared himself to be the exclusive artifact of Yue. Exactly like the naming, this artifact was a secret treasure class artifact that brought about power and recovery which surpassed even the god water limited only for Yue.



“…Nna”



Feeling the extremely sweet and burning pleasure from inside her body, Yue unintentionally leaked out a heavy gasp. But as though sensing that recovery of Yue, countless tentacles shot out with a blur from Ehitorujue. The tips of those tentacles were sharp, what they touched would surely get pierced in one attack.



Yue separated her mouth from Hajime’s neck and she directed one of her hands like a shield toward the approaching tentacles. Immediately, the space before her eyes distorted.



The tentacles rushed there.



But, all of them didn’t reach the two. It was because the distorted space swallowed everything. No, more accurately the tentacles were dismissed into another space.



In order to build a reliable defense using little magic power, Yue made use of the unstable space. Yue didn’t have the power to create a gate using space magic from zero that shut out the space, and so, in that case she just needed to create a gate to a different world using the space that was already shaking. If it was only expanding a hole in space that was already open, then it wouldn’t consume that much strength.



After Yue confirmed that the barrier of space dismissal had displayed a reliable effect, she moved her gaze to Hajime once more.



Hajime’s eyes were beginning to lose focus slightly. As expected, his limit was coming just by sucking the slight amount of blood just now. His face was growing pale, even now his consciousness looked like it would fell off anytime along with his eyelids. He was in a state that was barely clinging on consciousness by concentrating on the pain of his wound.



To Yue who was supporting his body, Hajime talked to her with a hoarse voice, nevertheless strength could be felt from that voice without any sign of giving up.



“Yue…you can, recover me…to a certain degree, right?”



“…Nn”



“I have…no card left. But…if there, is none――”



“…it just needs to be made.”



Understanding Hajime’s intention, Yue manipulated the space while continuing his sentence. To that Hajime made a faint smile and continued.



“…Destroy, that guy――”



“The concept, will be created right now. But, with only the magic power of me alone, it’s still insufficient.”



“With metamorphosis…magic. Make me――”



“-…subordination. Because there is blood in me”



Hajime grinned widely. This plan that made her wondered just how far he had predicted, and then the great recklessness in it, yet with his tremendous faith to her as the premise of the plan right from the start, made Yue unable to say anything anymore.



“…The material?”



“My, eye.”



Obeying Hajime’s instruction, Yue’s slender fingers were held aloft above Hajime’s right eye, and then, the fingers plunged in all at once. A groan slightly leaked from Hajime, but Yue unhesitatingly pulled out her fingers while her lips tightened into a straight line.



On her palm was a small bluish-white crystal. The magic eye stone.



“Yue…plea, se.”



“…Nn. Leave it to me.”



Like that the rite of metamorphosis began.



In order to obtain the necessary magic power, Yue sucked Hajime’s blood further which weakened him more and more. Hajime looked really frail that it wouldn’t be strange for his heartbeat to stop anytime.



But, the moment Yue’s hand touched Hajime’s chest, fierce heartbeat sound resounded as though an electric shock had just been applied there. *dokun, dokun!* Pulsating heartbeat was increasing in strength second by second.



That was a magic that transformed Hajime into a vampire just like Yue. It had the same principle like how Tio transformed another monster into her underling. If a frail and delicate human that was different from monster was used, normally that human wouldn’t come out of it safely, not to mention if it was a metamorphosis magic that changed a human’s race, the difficulty was of the highest degree.



From how Tio who was an expert of characteristic magic dragonification which had the origin from metamorphosis magic needed the black slave whip for assisting her success, it was clear to see just how difficult this grand magic was. And now Yue who wasn’t particularly skilled at metamorphosis magic was using something like that to a human target without any training beforehand.



Yue was a rare genius, but this magic had the possibility of success existed only because the target was Hajime who possessed inhuman toughness in body and mind. No, surely from the beginning Hajime who proposed this method was convinced that this would succeed. It was because of his trust from the bottom of his heart toward Yue.



The meat lump of Ehitorujue could be felt approaching lumpingly from far away. That was surely the countdown toward their death.



Because Yue split her strength for the metamorphosis magic, her control of the space became lax and several tentacles began to graze their body.



But, even in such an extreme situation, her beloved monstrous partner perfectly responded and bewitched her.



“Yu, e-“



“…Nn. Come here, Hajime.”



Hajime exposed his canine tooth with his pupil dyed crimson like Yue’s, and he bit at Yue’s smooth nape that looked so slender it felt like it would break when touched. And then, Hajime converted the blood into strength using the special trait of the vampire.



“…Nnaa”



Each time Hajime’s throat sounded, a sweet feverish breath escaped Yue’s mouth.



Even though she understood that strength was leaving her body, and even though she understood that now wasn’t the time for that, “more”, yet she was thinking of something like that.



Amidst the resounding sweet gasping voice, Hajime’s magic power was recovering in the proportion of the amount of blood flowing out.



However, Yue thought while feeling impatience.



(Not enough…)



Yes, it wasn’t enough. It really wasn’t enough to create a concept magic no matter what. With an amount of magic power that was even far from enough for Hajime’s complete recovery, it wouldn’t be sufficient to create a concept for finishing off the monster of the Holy Precincts which was getting close to them even now.



The limit of the blood flowing inside her would reach the limit soon. She was also grasping the amount of Hajime’s recovery. At this rate, they would have no other choice than putting a stake of sink or swim with their insufficient magic power. In addition that stake would be one with a considerably bad odd.



“It’s fine. Do you think, that the artifact(me) which is dedicated to you is only at this level?”



Perhaps looking at the impatience displayed on her face, Hajime who separated from Yue’s neck was saying such thing while he leaned forward to plunder Yue’s lips this time. And then, “nnu” Yue’s lip that was leaking small voice was wounded by Hajime’s canine tooth, at the same time, Hajime’s own lip also got cut.



Like that, while they were kissing each other repeatedly, it came.



*GOU-!!*



Magic power swelled up with terrific force.



The magic power that should be a step from drying up burst out from Yue and whirled in gold color. At the same time, a tremendous magic power that was unimaginable coming from the recovery amount just now also burst up from Hajime. With the two as the center, a torrent of magic power climbed as though piercing the heaven, no, it was actually piercing the space of Holy Precincts and pierced toward the heaven with violent blowing.



Golden and crimson entangled with each other, as though expressing the relationship between the two people, they mixed with each other, forming a complete harmony that raged violently.



――Particle style artifact ‘Vow of Entwined Branch’



Hajime’s blood that was turned into an artifact, and the metal particle that Yue took into her body. This metal particle was actually an artifact that activated only when under the prescribed condition. The effect and activation condition of this artifact was, the two who had tied the contract of blood pledge could then convert blood into power in a chain reaction with the two of them turned into artifact for each other and they exchanged blood with each other. The strengthening effect would continue endlessly until they stopped exchanging blood(kissing).



“…ahn”



The swelling power, and the happiness of intermingling with her beloved, it caused Yue to moan while her body was trembling. Hajime was also in the same state. The vampire princess in his embrace was so hopelessly lovely that he slightly repeated the blood tasted kiss.



The former shadow of Ehitorujue had arrived until right nearby them. It emitted an immense shockwave along with its tentacles.



――aaaAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA-!!!!



Toward that, Yue canceled the distorted space without even directing her eyes there.



She did that because she understood that such thing wasn’t necessary anymore. To display that, the golden and crimson magic power towered high like a protective wall. And then, at the next moment, the magic power released a tremendous shockwave that neutralized all shockwaves from the meat lump. It was the ‘Impact Conversion’ by Hajime.



Even during that time, the two were still gluing earnestly close with each other.



The figure of the Holy Precincts monster that was left alone, to be frank was pitiful.



Unable to forgive that, Ehitorujue increasingly emitted an extremely unpleasant strange sound while unleashing severe attacks.



While repelling all of those with magic power impact, Hajime and Yue who were accompanied by the tremendous magic power that already swelled up to the degree that it might destroy the white space, slowly separated their lips. The silver bridge hanging down between the two looked really captivating.



The sweet atmosphere of the two already far surpassed the territory of being out of place, however, people who could obstruct them didn’t exist anywhere in this world.



Both of them kept hugging, their hands softly overlapped. Between them there was the magic eye stone that was partly made from god crystal, and the tiny gun that Hajime didn’t let go at all even when they were sent flying.



And then, Hajime’s trump card(commonness) was chanted.



“’Transmute’!”



Right after that, golden and crimson melted into each other, and light so bright as though a sun was created manifested.



That beautiful and powerful radiance made the Ehitorujue monster to writhe and draw back. It was as though it hated that warm light.



The light was converging.



At its other side, there was the figure of Hajime pushing out his hand toward Ehitorujue with fierce eyes that glared sharply. A small gun was clutched in that hand.



The terrible exhaustion was causing the worn-out right hand to tremble all over, unable to fix the aim. That hand was scooped out from below softly and supported by a graceful hand. It was Yue’s hand.



While snuggling close to each other, both of them readied a single small gun. The running sparks were crimson and golden. The sure-kill bullet that would end everything was buzzing, impatiently waiting to be fired.



What was filled into that bullet was unmistakably a concept magic.



――GIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIII-!!!



Ehitorujue madly unleashed its tentacles. It instinctually comprehended the mighty power that was aimed at it.



But, there was no way such random attack could go through the golden and crimson the two were clad in, all of those were easily swept away by the impact of magic power.



And then,



“Giving victory to a man with a kiss, that’s really heroine-like huh, Yue.”



“…Nn. Hajime plucking off the victory at the end without fail, is just like a hero.”



Both of them were talking frivolously while aiming the brilliantly shining gun right at the middle of Ehitorujue.



“Well, putting that aside, there is one thing I want to say to that.”



“…Nn-“



For a moment, both of their eyes met. The fearless smile was floating on their respective face.



The spoken words were the concept of the newborn concept, the words that returned the favor toward the repeated calamities that were wretchedly forced on them. And then, surely, these words also represented the feeling of the people that were toyed around by Ehitorujue in the past.



“ “――The Scattered Pains Right Back Toward You(now you really have done it you shitty bastard-)” “



Soundlessly, a streak of light cut through the air.



That stabbed right in the middle of Ehitorujue without the slightest deviation.



Concept magic The Scattered Pains Right Back Toward You――this magic returned all the pain and wounds that the target had given to other people until now.



Just like the holy man that was once pierced by a holy spear on the hill of Golgotha, the thing that was once a god spurted out blood in a large amount from the wound opening. Although, the flowing out blood wasn’t something holy like that holy man, but something muddy black which looked sticky and unpleasant.



While the lump of meat was crumbling, the agglutinated mere shadow of Ehitorujue a beat later was,



――GIAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA



It raised a hair-rising shriek.



And then at the next moment, flesh and blood exploded to everywhere, silver magic power mixed with muddy black miasma climbed to the sky.



That was undoubtedly the scream of the death agony of the mad god. The repeated inhumanity that it had piled up for a few thousand years, or possibly tens of thousands of years were all returned to its own body. Although it had been reduced to a monster without any reasoning, it surely felt the pain of tens of thousands of years within an instant where even the torment of hell would feel lukewarm in comparison.



The flash that contained a shriek within pulverized the space, and it came out to the familiar dark red space at the other side.



Without any doubt, that must be the last scenery of Ehitorujue, the god of this world.



“…”



“…”



Hajime and Yue had no word.



They were merely staring at the last light of Ehitorujue that was vanishing toward the empty space that was gradually getting smaller. The gun their hand was holding couldn’t endure the burden and crumble into pieces.



The palms that weren’t holding anything now naturally held each other, their faces looked at each other. The magic power was already dispersing and the area around the two was quiet. Both of them had used up their stamina and magic power and everything else, they supported each other’s body leaning to one another and embraced the other party closely. And then, they smiled softly.



Perhaps because the creator of the place was gone, the white space began to rumble. The unstable space was gradually getting stormy, here and there breaking down was starting. Hajime ascertained the state of the surrounding and themselves and then he opened his mouth with a bitter expression.



“This is, bad. This doesn’t seem, to be the time, for looking…melancholic.”



“…Nn. Hajime, you can stand?”



“…Chih, my legs…not just that, my whole body, cannot move satisfactorily. Yue, you?”



“…Just sitting…take my all”



Both of them looked at each other and smiled wryly. It appeared that the true pinch only came after they consigned the god to oblivion.



“My bad, Yue. …The truth is, after killing Ehito, I planned, to wait for recover…and then used the particles…for creating gate key but…”



“…Nn. Doesn’t seem we will have that much time. There is, not even a drop of blood left to exchange.”



“Yeah. Besides…the particles themselves, are swallowed…by the unstable space, there is none remaining. At the worst case, I expected to use…the bone of the arm, or the leg…to make one-time use artifact…but…”



The crumbling of Holy Precincts was too fast that they wouldn’t make it in time if they wait for recovery, that caused Hajime’s expression to turn sour as though he had bitten a bitter bug. It wasn’t like he hadn’t imagined it, but Ehitorujue’s excessive obstinacy was to the degree that made Hajime had no extra leeway, that he had to pour all his strength to defeat him. Because of that, the composure to spare some recovery medicine, and also the blood for magic power conversion had run out already.



At the very end, Hajime curse inside his heart to himself “I’m an idiot”, however, there was not even a bit of despair in himself.



“To end…after coming this far…is unacceptable. We are going home, even if we need to crawl-“



“…Nn-“



They lent each other their shoulder and advanced bit by bit literally by crawling on the crumbling white world. They were walking slowly without any progress, but there wasn’t even a drop of the color of resignation in their eyes.



Even so, the reality was always callous, the crumbling of the surrounding was getting increasingly intense, approaching to swallow them altogether with their determination. Ahead of Hajime’s gaze, there was a veil of light that appeared unnoticed. That was the exit and entrance of this space.



The crumbling was approaching. Death was sneaking near. They desperately advance toward the veil of light.



But, the veil of light collapsed before their eyes.



“Shit-“



“…Hajime.”



Witnessing the path of their escape vanishing into sands, a curse leaked out spontaneously from Hajime’s mouth. The hand of Yue that was grasping Hajime’s hand clutched tightly to soothe him that was like that.



“…We are blocked from every direction. What’s left, is only…to gamble.”



“…Nn. Leap into, the crumbling space.”



